TYPES OF INTERVENTION Primary Intervention Screening for Impaired Glucose Tolerance (IGT) 1 TITLE: Effectiveness of Screening for Diabetes.
Gerken, K.L.; Van Lente, F. Archives of Pathology and Laboratory Medicine.
114(2): 201-203.
February 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the diagnostic yield from screening patients for diabetes by measuring their fasting serum glucose and hemoglobin A1c levels during routine health surveillance.
To compare the oral glucose tolerance test and repeat fasting glucose determination as a follow-up to screening.
CATEGORY: Primary intervention.
Type of Study: Retrospective.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Oral glucose tolerance testing was as cost effective and more efficient for diagnosing diabetes after an abnormal fasting serum glucose test than were repeat fasting serum glucose determinations.
Hemoglobin A1c did not reliably predict impaired or diabetic glucose tolerance.
RECOMMENDATION: If mass screening for diabetes is instituted, obligatory oral glucose tolerance testing must be made part of the follow-up protocols for positive findings on a fasting serum glucose test.
ABSTRACT: The authors analyzed the effectiveness of screening for diabetes mellitus in an executive health surveillance program by examining laboratory records for 6,445 patient visits from 1985 to 1988.
They retrospectively identified 336 persons with borderline high (6.6 to 7.6 mmol/L) or high (7.7 mmol/L or higher) fasting serum glucose levels; 29 of these persons had no further records, and 110 were known to have diabetes.
Of the remainder, 61 had a follow-up fasting serum glucose test and 33 had an oral glucose tolerance test.
Ninety-three persons had hemoglobin A1c (HbA1C) tested.
Among borderline high individuals, on repeat fasting serum glucose, 38 percent had levels of 6.1 mmol/L or less; 55 percent had 6.2 to 7.6 mmol/L; and 7 percent had 7.7 mmol/L or greater.
Comparable results for persons with high initial fasting serum glucose were 14, 25, and 61 percent, respectively.
Follow-up oral glucose tolerance tests resulted in normal, impaired, and diabetic glucose levels in 32, 40, and 28 percent of the borderline high persons and 25, 0, and 75 percent of the persons with high values, respectively.
Significantly different levels of HbA1C (p 
From screening, 30 new cases of diabetes and 10 new cases of impaired glucose tolerance were identified, a total of 40 (0.6 percent) of 6,445 patients screened.
The overall rate of identification of abnormal serum glucose was 0.6 percent.
The cost per case found (based on Medicare reimbursement rates) was $488.04 with repeat fasting serum glucose and an oral glucose tolerance test and $484.54 with a follow-up oral glucose tolerance test alone.
The oral glucose tolerance test is as cost effective as repeat fasting serum glucose with oral glucose tolerance testing as needed and more diagnostically efficient than repeating that test Addition of HbA1C increased cost to $522 and cannot be recommended.
The oral glucose tolerance test should be made obligatory to follow-up abnormal initial serum glucose tests.
3 tables, 12 references.
2 TITLE: Technical and Clinical Evaluation of Fructosamine Determination in Serum.
Desjarlais, F.; Comtois, R.; Beauregard, H.; Nguyen, M.; Letellier, G. Clinical Biochemistry.
22(4): 329-335.
August 1989.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the effectiveness of a serum fructosamine (glycated serum proteins) assay for diagnosis and follow-up of patients with diabetes; to compare its effectiveness with a serum glycosylated hemoglobin measurement.
CATEGORY: Primary intervention.
Type of Study: Nonrandomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The serum fructosamine assay is simple, rapid, and cost efficient.
RECOMMENDATION: The serum fructosamine assay should be a valuable addition to monitoring glucose control in patients with diabetes.
ABSTRACT: Researchers evaluated a serum fructosamine assay and compared the results with those of glycosylated hemoglobin for diagnosing and managing diabetes.
Blood samples were drawn from 375 participants with or without diabetes (total: 514 samples).
The serum fructosamine assay was not significantly affected by hemolysates, but high lipemia and addition of bilirubin decreased and increased the values, respectively.
In 48 normal participants, the correlation between serum fructosamine and serum protein or serum albumin was statistically significant, with a linear correlation of 0.809 and 0.746, respectively.
Overall, the linear correlation between serum fructosamine and glycosylated hemoglobin was 0.794; when fructosamine was corrected for protein, the value was 0.838.
Among 16 patients with diabetes hospitalized to improve blood glucose control, the linear correlation of the percent decrease for glycosylated hemoglobin and blood glucose was 0.28 (p 
Using a fructosamine concentration cutoff of 2.70 mmol/L (the normal mean plus two standard deviations), this test had a 96 percent specificity and a 90 percent sensitivity for patients with overt diabetes but only an 11 percent sensitivity for patients with diabetes by glucose tolerance test but normal fasting glucose levels.
When applied to gestational diabetes, fructosamine had a specificity of 95 percent but a sensitivity of just 21 percent.
Because the assay for fructosamine can be automated, it is easy and fast to use and the average per-patient cost is $0.93, including protein measurements.
The glycosylated hemoglobin test is performed manually, is difficult to interpret, and the per-patient cost is $6.15.
The serum fructosamine assay is simple, reliable, and economic for measuring ambient glucose concentration in stable and unstable diabetes mellitus.
It may be useful in diagnosing diabetes when the fasting blood glucose exceeds 7.8 mmol/L (overt diabetes).
In such cases, a concomitant fructosamine evaluation might preclude the need for a second fasting glucose.
5 figures, 2 tables, 30 references.
Secondary Intervention Screening and Diagnosis for Type 2 Diabetes Secondary Intervention Screening and Diagnosis for Type 2 Diabetes 3 TITLE: Comparison of glycosylated Hemoglobin and Fasting Plasma Glucose with TwoHour Post-Load Plasma Glucose in the Detection of Diabetes Mellitus.
Simon, D.; Coignet, M.C.; Thibult, N.; Senan, C.; Eschwege, E. American Journal of Epidemiology.
122(4): 589593.
October 1985.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the use of a glycosylated hemoglobin (HbA1C) test alone with a combination of that test and a plasma glucose measurement in a diabetes screening program.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Using the combination of an HbA1C measurement and a fasting plasma glucose measurement increases the specificity and predictive value of a positive diagnosis of diabetes over that obtained by glycosylated hemoglobin alone.
RECOMMENDATION: Longitudinal surveys should be performed to assess the validity of HbA1C as a measurement tool for diabetes screening.
ABSTRACT: From September 15, 1981, to April 1, 1984, 333 outpatients were recruited from the screening diabetes center of the Hôtel-Dieu Hospital in Paris.
Patients filled out a questionnaire; underwent a physical exam; had blood drawn for fasting plasma glucose, HbA1C, cholesterol, and triglyceride measurements; and took an oral glucose tolerance test with a 75-g glucose load.
With 2-hour plasma glucose values as a reference, sensitivities of the fasting plasma glucose measurement, HbA1C, and a combination of fasting plasma glucose and glycosylated hemoglobin were, respectively, 52 percent, 60 percent, and 40 percent; the specificities were 98.7 percent, 90.9 percent, and 99.4 percent; and the predictive values for a positive diagnosis were 76.5 percent, 34.9 percent, and 83.3 percent.
Taking into account the economic and psychosociologic implications of a diagnosis of diabetes, it is better for a screening test for asymptomatic diabetes to have a high degree of specificity and a high predictive value for a positive diagnosis than to have good sensitivity but poor specificity.
As an oral glucose tolerance test is time-consuming for patients and nurses, measurements of HbA1C by chromatography and of fasting plasma glucose appear to be less expensive (about 5 versus 10 U.S. dollars).
Longitudinal surveys are needed to assess the validity of HbA1C as a tool for diabetes screening.
1 table, 32 references.
4 TITLE: Comparison of Screening Tests for Non-Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
Hanson, R.L.; Nelson, R.G.; McCance, D.R.; Beart, J.A.; Charles, M.A.; Pettitt, D.J.; Knowler, W.C. Archives of Internal Medicine.
153(18): 2133-2140.
September 27, 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To compare four screening tests for type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Population screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Fasting plasma glucose was the best test for screening, but glycated hemoglobin and quantitative urine glucose also provided high specificity with sensitivities approximately 80 percent or higher.
RECOMMENDATION: The choice of a particular screening test should depend on assay cost, convenience, and availability.
ABSTRACT: The authors compared the sensitivity of measuring quantitative urine glucose, dipstick urine glucose, fasting plasma glucose, and glycated hemoglobin to screen for diabetes in Pima Indians, a tribe at high risk for type 2 diabetes.
Fasting plasma glucose concentrations and glycated hemoglobin (HbA1 or HbA1C) were compared in 2,092 fasting participants; glycated hemoglobin, quantitative glycosuria, and dipstick glycosuria were compared in 237 nonfasting participants.
Among nonfasting participants, at specificities of 98 or 99 percent, sensitivities for detecting diabetes were 80.6 percent for quantitative glycosuria, 64.3 percent for dipstick glycosuria, and 92.9 percent for HbA1.
For detecting diabetes with severe hyperglycemia, sensitivities for the 3 tests ranged from 85.0 percent (HbA1) to 96.0 percent (quantitative glycosuria), with similar specificities.
Among fasting participants, at a specificity of 98.3 percent the sensitivity of fasting plasma glucose was 88.0 percent; at similar specificities, HbA1 had a sensitivity of 78.8 percent and HbA1C, 80.3 percent.
For detecting diabetes with severe hyperglycemia, all 3 tests had a sensitivity of 94.6 percent or greater with specificity of 98 percent.
The slightly higher sensitivity of fasting plasma glucose (versus glycated hemoglobin) is probably of minimal significance because fasting plasma glucose is a less convenient test. glycosuria assays have limited ability to detect diabetes with moderate hyperglycemia, but they reliably detect severe hyperglycemia.
4 figures, 4 tables, 41 references.
5 TITLE: Effectiveness of glycosylated Hemoglobin, Fasting Plasma Glucose, and a Single Post Load Plasma Glucose Level in Population Screening for Glucose Intolerance.
Modan, M.; Halkin, H.; Karasik, A.; Lusky, A. American Journal of Epidemiology.
119(3): 431-444.
March 1984.
OBJECTIVE: To determine which of the following methods is the most effective screening test for glucose intolerance (impaired glucose tolerance and type 2 diabetes): glycosylated hemoglobin, fasting plasma glucose, combination of fasting plasma glucose and glycosylated hemoglobin, plasma glucose 1-hour post oral glucose load, and plasma glucose 2-hour post oral glucose load.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Population screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The most effective screening methods were the 1- and 2-hour post oral glucose loads.
The 1-hour post oral glucose load worked better for detecting glucose intolerance, and the 2-hour post oral glucose load was better for detecting diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: For clinical diagnosis, a two-stage screening using a fasting or random blood glucose test and an oral glucose load may be adequate, but for epidemiologic studies a full oral glucose tolerance test that includes a fasting test and two post-load levels is preferred.
ABSTRACT: The study population included a sample group of 2,040 people, aged 40-70 years, who were participating in the Israel Study of Glucose Intolerance, Obesity and Hypertension.
Members of the sample group who were not known to have diabetes underwent a glucose tolerance test based on a fasting test and 1-hour and 2-hour post oral glucose loads.
In 1,058 participants, glycosylated hemoglobin was also measured.
Results showed that glycosylated hemoglobin alone is inefficient and inferior to a fasting plasma glucose test to determine glucose intolerance.
Although glycosylated hemoglobin increased with glucose intolerance, there was considerable overlap in the distributions between newly identified patients with diabetes and patients with normal tolerance.
The combination of the glycosylated hemoglobin test with the fasting plasma glucose test did not perform any better than the fasting test alone.
However, testing fasting plasma glucose is not a satisfactory screening method because of its low specificities at adequate sensitivity levels compared with the 1- and 2-hour post glucose load tests.
Of these tests, the 2-hour post glucose load level is more reliable when screening for diabetes alone, and the 1-hour post glucose load is more effective in screening for impaired glucose tolerance.
Adding a fasting test to the 1- and 2hour post glucose load tests raised the cost less than 5 percent, and the risk analysis showed that the venipunctures needed for the tests were not associated with any problems in patients.
If a distinction is desired between impaired glucose tolerance and diabetes, a two-stage screening is indicated.
In this method, everyone gets a 1-hour post load and the positive subgroup is retested by a full oral glucose tolerance test.
For purposes of epidemiologic screening, a full oral glucose tolerance test is preferred over any "shortcut" method.
1 figure, 6 tables, 28 references.
6 TITLE: The glycosylated Hemoglobin as a Diagnostic and Monitoring Tool for Diabetes: Evidence from Claims Data (abstract).
Altan, A.E.; Carlson, A.M.; Nettles, A. AHSR FHSR Annual Meeting Abstract Book.
1996; 13:11.
OBJECTIVE: To investigate how often the glycosylated hemoglobin (HbAlc) test is used to diagnose type 2 diabetes and the extent to which it is used to monitor diabetes control.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Claims review.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The HbAlc test may be misused as a diagnostic tool for type 2 diabetes and underused as a tool to monitor diabetes control.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: 1993 managed eastern United insulin-treated the recognized The investigators examined claims records of 81,039 persons enrolled in three care plans located in large metropolitan areas in the western, midwestern, or States.
The researchers identified individuals with diagnosed diabetes (both and noninsulin-treated); those who had received the oral glucose tolerance test, diagnostic test for diabetes; and those who had received the HbAlc test.
Among enrollees identified as not having diabetes (n = 70,068), 1,141 received an HbAlc test; of these persons, 4 percent (44 enrollees) also were given an oral glucose tolerance test.
Of the 10,970 persons identified as having diabetes, 40 percent had had at least one HbAlc test during the year.
7 TITLE: Immunization to Prevent Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus? The Economics of Genetic Screening and Vaccination for Diabetes.
England, W.L.; Roberts, S.D. Annals of Internal Medicine.
94(3): 395-400.
March 1981.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the relative value of several strategies for preventing diabetes through the use of vaccine.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Vaccinating all children at age 3 was preferable, both economically and for disease prevention, to strategies that involved histocompatibility leukocyte antigen (HLA) screening prior to vaccination or to no vaccination at all.
RECOMMENDATION: Health programs and technologies need to be analyzed (e.g., for cost and risk) before they become available.
ABSTRACT: Numerous studies have shown an association between type 1 diabetes and viral infections, which suggests that vaccination for diabetes may be possible.
The principal assumption behind the present paper is that viruses are involved in precipitating diabetes and that a vaccine for them can be developed.
The author calculated an incidence rate for new cases of diabetes and program costs for 12 approaches to vaccination, 10 involving screening -- the other 2 were vaccinating everyone and vaccinating no one.
A decision tree analysis framework was used: the cost analysis considered the direct cost of diabetes, vaccine production and immunization, screening for predisposition to diabetes (measures evaluated included eight types of HLA tests, the Lewis negative erythrocyte phenotype, and the presence of diabetes in a parent or sibling), and side effects.
The investigators used data based on published sources if possible; when data were inadequate or not available, a sensitivity analysis was performed.
Only direct costs were tabulated.
The analysis presupposed that any vaccinations would take place at age 3 (the most cost-effective age for all policies); incidence rates are the projected results after 27 years of vaccinating.
Vaccinating everyone would reduce incidence by 29 percent and decrease the nondiscounted annual cost of diabetes by 18 percent; this policy was preferred to the other 11 on the basis of both incidence and cost.
These results were, however, heavily influenced by the cost and efficacy of the vaccine, cost and probability of a vaccine reaction, cost and probability of diabetes, and the discount rate.
A decision to vaccinate everyone was preferred to other alternatives for a wide range of vaccine characteristics.
7 tables, 51 references.
8 TITLE: Multiple Biochemical Blood Testing as a Case-Finding Tool in Ambulatory Medical Patients.
Ruttimann, S.; Dreifuss, M.; Clemencon, D.; di Gallo, A.; Dubach, U.C.
The American Journal of Medicine.
94(2): 141-148.
February 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To prospectively assess the yield, disadvantages, and charges associated with routine biomedical testing in a medical outpatient clinic.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Routine biochemical testing in the university teaching setting was useful in identifying new diagnoses, but the number of newly discovered disorders that required new medical management was small.
RECOMMENDATION: Reducing the number of routine biomedical tests to three -- cholesterol, glucose, and alanine aminotransferase measurements -- to detect disorders that need treatment may be preferable to ordering large biochemical profiles.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the utility of routine biochemical tests in finding new disorders that changed medical management.
Patients (n = 493) attending the medical outpatient clinic of the University Hospital in Basel, Switzerland, for the first time during 1989 underwent a 23-test biochemical screen.
To differentiate clinically indicated from routine tests, resident physicians were instructed to order only tests required to monitor known or suspected medical conditions, even though the complete profile was performed.
Patient charges were $40 for the biochemical profile and $17.60 for each additional visit caused exclusively by abnormal routine tests; charges were counted until diagnosis or patient discharge.
Ninety percent of the tests were considered routine; 11.4 percent of these routine tests were abnormal.
Four hundred thirty of the 493 patients had new abnormalities diagnosed on the routine tests; further tests were ordered for 10.9 percent of these patients, additional visits were required for 1.4 percent, and new diagnoses were reached for 11.1 percent.
A change in management occurred in 5.8 percent (n = 25) of these patients; in all but 4 of these cases the newly detected disorder was hypercholesterolemia, alcoholic liver disease, or diabetes mellitus.
These 21 cases could have been detected with cholesterol, glucose, and alanine aminotransferase tests alone.
Total charges for all tests were $20,938; total charges for tests considered clinically indicated were $8,256.
Additional charges per patient for the detection of the new diagnoses averaged $25.72.
Using only the tests relevant to the new diagnoses, per-patient charges would have been reduced 30 percent.
Biochemical screening in this setting is feasible and results in acceptable amounts of further testing and additional patient laboratory costs.
Prospective studies should be developed to test the utility of reducing screening to cholesterol, glucose, and alanine aminotransferase tests only.
4 tables, 41 references.
9 TITLE: Screening for Diabetes Mellitus in General Practice Using a Reflectance Meter System: The Islington Diabetes Survey.
Forrest, R.D.; Jackson, C.A.; Yudkin, J.S. Diabetes Research.
6(3): 119-122.
November 1987.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the accuracy of a reflectance meter system in screening for diabetes mellitus in a community-based screening program; to compare the results obtained with the laboratory assessment of blood glucose; and to estimate the costs of screening for diabetes mellitus with this system.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Population screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The reflectance meter system accurately estimated the prevalence of diabetes mellitus in the study population.
Blood glucose concentrations obtained with the reflectance meter were higher than those of the laboratory assay, and confirmatory glucose tolerance tests were needed in a large number of misclassified patients.
However, total costs of screening, even with the additional confirmatory glucose tolerance tests, were still significantly lower for the reflectance meter assay.
RECOMMENDATION: The glucose reflectance meter system, along with confirmatory glucose tolerance tests, can provide an acceptable, lower-cost alternative to the autoanalyzer glucose-oxidase method of blood glucose assay for community-based screening for diabetes mellitus.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the accuracy and costs of a reflectance meter system for screening for diabetes mellitus and compared the results obtained with laboratory assessment of blood glucose.
As a component of the Islington Diabetes Survey, 1,084 randomly selected persons over age 40 were screened with an oral glucose tolerance test after an overnight fast.
Two-hour blood glucose was measured using an automated glucose-oxidase method.
For 530 persons, blood glucose was also measured using the reflectance meter system.
The reflectance meter system gave an acceptable estimate of the prevalence of diabetes mellitus, identifying 14 of the 15 cases found by the glucose-oxidase system, but it did not provide an accurate estimate of the prevalence of impaired glucose tolerance.
(Reflectance meter values were higher than glucose-oxidase values in 82 percent of cases.)
Costs associated with screening the 530 individuals were calculated at £1,166.00 for the glucose-oxidase method and £358.75 for the reflectance meter.
Confirmatory glucose tolerance tests were required in 29 persons on the basis of glucose-oxidase values and in 47 on the basis of reflectance meter values.
Total costs for these confirmatory tests were estimated at £1,460.90 for patients initially screened via glucose-oxidase and £857.95 for those screened by the reflectance meter.
Estimated total costs per case of diabetes mellitus identified were £97.39 for the glucose-oxidase method and £ 61.28 for the reflectance meter.
The authors conclude that the reflectance meter is an acceptable screening tool for diabetes; it is less costly, it is simpler and easier to use, and it provides results faster than the glucose-oxidase method.
2 figures, 1 table, 16 references.
10 TITLE: Screening for Retinopathy: A Relative Cost-Effectiveness Analysis of Alternative Modalities and Strategies.
Sculpher, M.J.; Buxton, M.J.; Ferguson, B.A.; Spiegelhalter, D.J.; Kirby, A.J. Health Economics.
1(1): 39-51.
April 1992.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the relative cost-effectiveness of various screening strategies for retinopathy associated with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Systematic screening carried out in the general practitioner's office at the same time as routine diabetes care checks can save considerable costs over screening that requires additional visits to a hospital or an optician.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors used data from a 1985-1988 English study of the costeffectiveness of screening for retinopathy to compare various screening options, including single modalities (either ophthalmoscopy or fundus photography), combined approaches, and selective screening.
The base study was conducted at three community-based health centers in England; 3,423 patients with diabetes were screened.
The authors defined cost-effectiveness as cost per true-positive case detected.
Total cost per patient for ophthalmoscopy at the general practitioner's office was £ 20.66; at an optician's office, £ 19.31; for fundus photography, this cost was £ 25.46 at the hospital and £ 14.87 at the general practitioner's office (costs at the general practitioner's office were less if screening was part of a general checkup).
The sensitivity of these approaches (in the order just listed) was 0.53, 0.48, 0.40, and 0.58; specificity was 0.91, 0.94, 0.96, and 0.97.
Combined approaches (e.g., both ophthalmoscopy and fundus photography at the general practitioner's office) had higher sensitivity but lower specificity.
Expected cost per true-positive case detected was £ 784 for ophthalmoscopy (same for general practitioner and optician), £ 1,178 for hospital-based fundus photography, £ 497 for photography at the general practitioner's office, £ 734 for both ophthalmoscopy and photography at the general practitioner's office, and £ 968 for ophthalmoscopy by an optician combined with photography at a general practice.
If screening at the general practitioner's office was combined with regular follow-up, these costs dropped to £ 273 for ophthalmoscopy, £ 434 for fundus photography, £ 419 for ophthalmoscopy plus photography, and £ 914 for photography at the office combined with ophthalmoscopy on the optician's premises.
Among the selective screening options, directly referring high-risk patients and not screening those who were low-risk had the lowest cost per true-positive case ( £ 168) but only 0.25 sensitivity.
Directly referring high-risk patents and providing both ophthalmoscopy and photography at the general practitioner's office had a sensitivity of 0.85 and a cost per true positive of £ 679 ( £ 407 if part of a general check-up).
1 figure, 5 tables, 42 references.
11 TITLE: Targeted Screening for Diabetes in Community Chiropody Clinics.
Gill, G.V.; Lishman, L.; Kaczmarczyk, E.; Tesfaye, S. Quarterly Journal of Medicine.
89:229-232.
1996.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the cost-effectiveness of screening for diabetes in adults attending community podiatry clinics.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Screening was simple and very cost effective, but the diagnostic yield was moderate.
RECOMMENDATION: Screening of a podiatry clinic's population for diabetes cannot be recommended without knowing what percentage of that population is already known to have diabetes.
ABSTRACT: Patients who have known foot problems may have an increased likelihood of having diabetes.
In this study, which was based in Liverpool, England, all patients aged 40 to 75 years attending community chiropody (podiatry) clinics who were not previously known to have diabetes were offered postprandial screening for glycosuria.
Patients who reported positive results on the self-test were brought to the hospital for a glucose tolerance test.
Of 1,058 patients who accepted screening, 11 (1.0 percent) reported positive results; of this group, 4 had diabetes, 2 had impaired glucose tolerance, and 5 had normal glucose tolerance.
The cost for each person screened was 11 pence; for each person with a positive urine test, £ 2.06; and for each newly diagnosed patient with diabetes, £ 34.46.
No cost was included for staff time in the coordinating hospital chiropody department to respond to the participants.
The authors indicate that their slightly disappointing result (0.4 percent new diabetes patients) is probably due to the very high proportion (17.3 percent) of Liverpool chiropody clinic patients already known to have type 2 diabetes.
According to the authors, screening of a podiatry clinic's population cannot be recommended without knowing its proportion of already identified diabetes patients.
They also observe that a major difficulty with screening for type 2 diabetes is the lack of a sufficiently sensitive and specific test.
The authors also point out that handing out rather than mailing the test strips was cost-saving, as was having the patients telephone in their results.
1 figure, 2 tables, 15 references.
12 TITLE: Value of Serum Glucose Assay as Part of the Biochemical Profile in Screening for Diabetes.
Northam, B.E.; Smith, J.H.; Fitzgerald, M.G.; Nattrass, M.; Wright, A.D. Annals of Clinical Biochemistry.
19(6): 412-415.
November 1982.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate a system of identifying patients with previously undetected diabetes that begins with a screening assay for serum glucose.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Addition of serum glucose testing for inpatients undergoing other laboratory evaluations is a useful and cost-effective method of screening for diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors report the effectiveness and cost of diabetes screening for adult inpatients at General Hospital in Birmingham, England, during 3 months in 1980.
A serum glucose test was added to the routine biochemical profiles of 2,050 patients; 453 had values of 10 mmol/L or higher.
After elimination of those known to have diabetes or receiving intravenous glucose, 152 patients underwent capillary blood glucose tests; 71 had elevated values.
Ten of these patients were referred to the diabetes clinic, 42 underwent oral glucose tolerance testing, and 19 were lost because of illness, death, or discharge.
Fifteen patients were found to have normal glucose tolerance, 11 had impaired glucose tolerance, and for 16, the glucose tolerance test was in the diabetes range (3 of these 16 patients were referred to the diabetes clinic).
Retesting as outpatients 3 months later resulted in referral of two of the patients with impaired glucose tolerance and one with apparent diabetes to the diabetes clinic.
In all, 16 patients with previously undetected diabetes were identified.
Additional costs on an annual basis for direct screening were £ 500 for serum glucose testing (reagent only), £ 320 for 2 blood glucose tests (including labor for sample collection and analysis), and £ 440 for oral glucose tolerance testing, for a total of £ 1,260, or £ 20 per case of diabetes identified (64 cases in a year).
If time for staff (other than the clinical staff) to eliminate patients with diabetes and on intravenous glucose was added, the total per case would be doubled.
The prevalence of diabetes (0.8 percent of inpatients) may have been underestimated because of losses to follow-up (30 patients), size of dose of glucose for the glucose tolerance testing (50 g rather than 75 g), arbitrary selection of serum glucose concentration required for follow-up, and elimination of patients receiving intravenous glucose.
The true prevalence of diabetes was probably 0.8 percent to 3.5 percent.
This screening method is cost effective, based on the additional screening cost of only £ 20 per case of diabetes identified.
1 figure, 2 tables, 8 references.Disease Management Disease Management 13 TITLE: Adherence to Treatment and Social Support in Patients with Non-Insulin Dependant Diabetes.
Garay-Sevilla, M.E.; Nava, L.E.; Malacara, J.M.; Huerta, R.; Díaz de León, J.; Mena, A.; Fajardo, M.E. Journal of Diabetes and Its Complications.
9(2): 81-86.
April-June 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate factors associated with adherence to diet and medication in patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Adherence to diet was associated with years since diagnosis and greater social support; adherence to medication was associated with greater social support and older age of spouse.
RECOMMENDATION: Further research should be conducted to identify psychological and social factors that influence adherence to diet and medication in patients with type 2 diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The authors studied 200 adults with type 2 diabetes recruited from diabetes support groups at two hospitals in Leon, Mexico.
Only about 20 percent of patients invited actually participated in the study.
These patients completed validated questionnaires detailing adherence to treatment, social support, lifestyle, family structure, family function, and knowledge of diabetes.
Adherence to diet was associated with years since diagnosis (p = 0.003) and greater social support (p = 0.007); adherence to medication was associated with greater social support (p = 0.002) and older age of spouse (p = 0.016).
Patients with rigid control in their families had lower adherence to medication than patients where families had laissez-faire or flexible control.
Evaluation of the psychological and social factors that influence adherence to diet and medication is essential because of their important role in the management of patients with type 2 diabetes.
1 figure, 3 tables, 18 references.
14 TITLE: Analysis of Direct Cost of Standard Compared with Intensive Insulin Treatment of Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus and Cost of Complications.
Stern, Z.; Levy, R. Acta Diabetologica.
33(1): 48-52.
March 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the direct costs of standard and intensive insulin treatment for type 1 diabetes; to compare these approaches when their impact on complications is considered.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: According to the authors' model, standard insulin therapy was less expensive over a 35-year period than was intensive insulin therapy, whether or not the cost of complications was considered.
RECOMMENDATION: Because of the high direct costs of intensive treatment, guidelines should be developed to better identify, select, and treat those patients for whom such therapy is warranted.
Intensive treatment should be aimed particularly at patients with nephropathy.
ABSTRACT: The authors modeled annual treatment costs over a 35-year period for a hypothetical patient who had contracted type 1 diabetes at a young age.
Results in the literature, including findings of the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial, were used in the model, as was standard practice in Israel, which follows the recommendations of the American Diabetes Association.
Annual direct costs (in 1995 dollars) for standard and intensive insulin treatment were calculated to be $1,184 and $3,329 per patient, respectively.
Over a 35-year period, total direct costs per patient were $41,000 and $116,000 for the standard and intensive treatments, respectively, a difference of $75,000.
The authors found that intensified treatment lowered complication costs by $53,520 (versus standard treatment).
Thus, total direct costs of standard therapy were $329,400, versus $350,980 for the intensified treatment.
Assuming a discount rate of 6 percent, it was estimated that the intensive treatment entailed lower complication costs (by $20,900) than the standard treatment, but the total cost of the standard treatment was $132,900, compared with $151,900 for the intensive treatment.
3 tables, 16 references.
15 TITLE: Assessment of the Effect of a Comprehensive Diabetes Management Program on Hospital Admission Rates of Children with Diabetes Mellitus.
Drozda, D.J.; Dawson, V.A.; Long, D.J.; Freson, L.S.; Sperling, M.A. Diabetes Educator.
16(5): 389-393.
SeptemberOctober 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the impact of a comprehensive diabetes management program on hospitalization parameters in children with diabetes seen at a major pediatric referral center.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Care provided through the diabetes management program is expected to save $342,000 annually in direct health service costs.
RECOMMENDATION: Comparison of data from pediatric hospitals not offering comprehensive diabetes programs would help to assess the impact of such programs.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the impact of a comprehensive diabetes management program initiated in July 1978 on admission of children with diabetes mellitus to Children's Hospital Medical Center in Cincinnati, Ohio.
Those in the study had a primary diagnosis of type 1 diabetes; the main reason for admission was diabetic ketoacidosis, hyperglycemia, or hypoglycemia.
Admission records from January 1973 through December 1987 were reviewed; comparisons were made of admission parameters for January 1973 to June 1978 (period A) and July 1978 to December 1987 (period B).
The program included medical and support services and individualized educational interventions; two telephone hot lines were provided as well.
Admissions for type 1 diabetes not associated with diabetic ketoacidosis or other diagnoses rose from 27 percent of all admissions in period A to 37 percent in period B (p = 0.01).
The proportion of admissions for diabetes that were for diabetic ketoacidosis not associated with other diagnoses decreased from 63 percent in period A to 29 percent in period B (p = 0.0001).
This positive outcome may have reflected the effect of the education program on patient self-management.
Mean length of stay for admissions for diabetic ketoacidosis only decreased from 5.8 days (period A) to 4.6 days (period B) (p = 0.01), but the introduction of managed care may have encouraged early discharge.
2 figures, 2 tables, 13 references.
16 TITLE: Audit in General Practice by a Receptionist: A Feasibility Study.
Essex, B.; Bate, J. British Medical Journal.
302(6776): 573-576.
March 9, 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To assess whether a medical practice audit, including care of patients with diabetes, can be performed cost effectively by a practice's receptionist.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The practice audit was performed by the receptionist in a cost-effective manner.
RECOMMENDATION: Audit by a practice's receptionist should be considered a costeffective alternative to audit by the physicians themselves.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of having a medical practice audit performed by a practice receptionist.
The practice was composed of 6 physicians in London, England, treating 11,500 patients.
A system developed to allow the receptionist to audit medical records was evaluated over a 2-year period.
Patients with diabetes were identified from disease registers; most data were derived from patient records.
A total of 136 patients with diabetes were identified by the receptionist and their records reviewed.
The receptionist provided the practice with a breakdown of the level of care (general practitioner only, hospital only, shared, or unknown).
The receptionist notified practice physicians of any patients with diabetes under the care of a general practitioner who had not had an annual review.
The receptionist spent about 4 hours weekly performing the audit as part of her general duties at a cost of £ 5.20 per hour ( £ 960 per year).
Regular supervision of the receptionist the first year lasted about 30 minutes weekly; in the second year, about 30 minutes every 2 weeks.
After deduction of reimbursements and tax, the cost came to £ 30 per practice physician per year.
This system was extremely cost-effective compared with the costs that would be incurred were physicians to perform the audit themselves.
4 figures, 10 references.
17 TITLE: Bedside Blood Sugar Determinations in the Critically Ill.
Newman, R.H. Heart and Lung.
17(6 Part 1): 667669.
November 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To compare various glucose monitoring systems with standard laboratory testing in terms of accuracy and cost-effectiveness.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Results for a bedside system called the Glucoscan 2000 were highly correlated with hospital laboratory results, but the bedside system took less time (mean: 2.4 minutes versus 2.6 hours) and was significantly less expensive (for 110 determinations, $55 in costs versus $990 in charges).
RECOMMENDATION: Glucose monitoring systems cannot and should not replace laboratory glucose determinations, but they can greatly reduce their frequency and supplement expensive laboratory data.
A quality control regimen must be implemented for the selected glucose monitoring device to ensure its accuracy.
ABSTRACT: Intensive care unit patients may have large fluctuations in blood glucose concentration; accurate and timely glucose values must be obtained so that these fluctuations may be stabilized.
The author compared three blood glucose monitoring systems (AccuCheck, Glucometer, Glucoscan 2000) with the hospital laboratory; there were no significant differences in results between the systems.
In a subsequent 3month study, the Glucoscan 2000 and hospital laboratory performed 110 blood glucose determinations in 41 patients; for the first 50 blood glucose tests, mean completion time was 2.4 minutes for the Glucoscan 2000 and 2.6 hours for the hospital (routine) or 0.5 hours ("stat").
Laboratory charges for 110 laboratory determinations totaled $990, versus Glucoscan costs of $55.
The author concludes that blood glucose monitoring systems can be effective for close monitoring of blood glucose in the intensive care unit or elsewhere.
The purchase price of the Glucoscan 2000 was $127.
1 figure, 2 tables, 16 references.
18 TITLE: Cardiovascular Morbidity and Mortality in Type 2 Diabetic Patients: A 22 Year Historical Cohort Study in Dutch General Practice. de Grauw, W.J.C.; van de Lisdonk, E.H.; van den Hoogen, H.J.M.; van Weel, C. Diabetic Medicine.
12(2): 117122.
February 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the impact of cardiovascular morbidity and mortality on patients in general practice with type 2 diabetes over a 22year period.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Historical cohort.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Patients in general practice with type 2 diabetes were at higher risk of cardiovascular morbidity, mortality from any cause, and cardiovascular mortality than were those without diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: An historical cohort study was performed to measure cardiovascular morbidity and mortality in patients with type 2 diabetes; data were collected from 1967 to 1989 in four Dutch general practices involved in the Continuous Morbidity Registration Nijmegen.
A total of 265 patients with type 2 diabetes (112 men, 153 women) who met World Health Organization (WHO) criteria were included in the cohort.
The remaining 162 patients who were registered during the study period as diagnosed with diabetes were not included because they did not meet WHO criteria or because of other reasons.
At diagnosis, 60 percent of the study cohort were aged 65 or under; mean follow-up was 6.8 years.
Compared with a matched control group of persons without diabetes, those with type 2 diabetes had higher cardiovascular morbidity (risk ratio, 1.76; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.34 to 2.30).
The risk of mortality was also higher in patients with diabetes than in controls (relative risk, 1.54; 95 percent confidence interval, 1.07 to 2.23).
Relative risk of cardiovascular mortality was 2.05 in patients with diabetes (95 percent confidence interval, 1.24 to 3.37).
Mortality after 10 years for patients with type 2 diabetes was 36 percent, versus 20 percent for the control group (p 
Cumulative survival rates in the group aged 65 to 74 years were significantly lower (p 
2 figures, 3 tables, 32 references.
19 TITLE: Care of the Diabetic Child in the Community.
Farquhar, J.W.; Campbell, M.L. British Medical Journal.
281(6254): 1534-1537.
December 6, 1980.
OBJECTIVE: To describe community care for children with newly diagnosed type 1 diabetes, and to describe in-hospital care for such children.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Descriptive analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Admitting children with newly diagnosed diabetes to the hospital, then providing them with a home care team, offers numerous advantages for the children and their parents.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors describe experience with children newly diagnosed with diabetes who have been admitted to the Royal Hospital for Sick Children in Edinburgh, Scotland.
Admitting to the hospital a child newly diagnosed with diabetes along with one or both parents allows parents to develop trust in the staff, to learn more effectively about their child, and to meet the home care sisters.
Staff can obtain an indication of parental ability and stability, and an insulin reaction can be induced safely so that the parent can watch the child's reaction to hypoglycemia.
The child is normally discharged within 1 week.
Having a home care team enabled the hospital to have an average length of stay of about 4.5 days in 1976, versus the national average of 8 days.
The home care team permits reduced readmissions, relieves maternal and school teacher anxiety, and decreases school absences.
The home care team continually assesses the home -- its organization, finances, presence of alcoholism, stability of the parents and marriage, relationships of parents and children and relationships between children, how procedures are conducted, and the extent to which parents seek further education toward controlling diabetes.
The home care team visits the school and briefs staff and the school nurse on symptoms and treatment of hypoglycemia and the needs of the child.
The team provides continuing care through phone consultations, visits the home when the children are in school, and obtains spot urine specimens or blood checks if there is a question of diabetic control.
To avoid disharmony between the hospital clinic and the primary care and community health services, each important contact with the home care team or the unit staff should be recorded.
4 references.
20 TITLE: A Comparison of Accuracy and Estimated Cost of Methods for Home Blood Glucose Monitoring.
Shapiro, B.; Savage, P.J.; Lomatch, D.; Gniadek, T.; Forbes, R.; Mitchell, R.; Hein, K.; Starr, R.; Nutter, M.; Scherdt, B. Diabetes Care.
4(3): 396-403.
MayJune 1981.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the accuracy, convenience, and cost of various methods of home blood glucose monitoring.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: All the capillary blood glucose methods correlated well with laboratory blood glucose measurements and all were more accurate than urine glucose measurements.
The Chemstrip bG was the least expensive and easiest method to measure blood glucose concentrations at home.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors compared accuracy, convenience, and cost of four products for home blood glucose monitoring.
Sixteen patients used Eyetone, Dextrometer, StatTek (all of which used a reflectance meter and a reagent strip), and Chemstrip bG (reagent strip only) twice daily within 1 minute of collection of venous blood for laboratory blood glucose measurement.
Urine glucose was measured from collections made before and after blood collection.
For laboratory blood glucose concentrations of 48 to 464 mg/dL and 48 to 250 mg/dL, correlation coefficients for Eyetone, Dextrometer, and StatTek reflectance meter readings (by a physician or nurse) and for Chemstrip bG readings by the patient, a nurse, and a physician ranged from 0.90 to 0.95 and from 0.85 to 0.92, respectively (p 
All home blood glucose monitoring methods except StatTek underestimated blood glucose concentrations between 48 and 250 mg/dL.
The correlation coefficient for urine glucose concentrations was 0.74.
When Chemstrip bG was reread at intervals over 14 days, glucose readings decreased by 6.8 to 10.1 percent (not clinically significant) in the first 2 days; no further decrease was noted.
The coefficient of variation (CV) for repeated readings of the three reflectance meters was 8.9 to 12.0 percent for nurses and 6.7 to 9.0 percent for physicians; the CV for Chemstrip bG was 17.8 and 11.6 percent, respectively.
The costs (1980 dollars) per glucose determination (excluding cost of reflectance meter) for Dextrometer, Eyetone, StatTek, and Chemstrip were $0.71 to $1.32, $0.51 to $0.71, $0.72 to $1.01, and $0.53, respectively, and reflectance meters for the first three cost between $339.95 and $395.00.
The Chemstrip bG method is easy to use and less expensive than the other systems, and readings can be verified by a physician up to 2 weeks later.
3 figures, 5 tables, 26 references.
21 TITLE: Comparison of Different Models of Diabetes Care on Compliance with SelfMonitoring of Blood Glucose by Memory Glucometer.
Hoskins, P.L.; Alford, J.B.; Handelsman, D.J.; Yue, D.K.; Turtle, J.R. Diabetes Care.
11(9): 719-724.
October 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the accuracy of patient-generated records of blood glucose concentrations, and to determine whether the model of diabetes care influences the validity of these patient records.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: There was no difference in validity of reported blood glucose results based on instruction technique, but private health insurance status was associated with greater validity of patient records.
RECOMMENDATION: Health professionals should not assume that patients will follow treatment instructions because they have been fully counseled.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated 34 patients with diabetes on their self-monitoring of blood glucose.
Participants had been referred to the diabetes center of Royal Prince Alfred Hospital in Camperdown, Australia; 17 had gestational diabetes; 13 had type 2 diabetes; and 4 had type 1 diabetes.
Participants were randomized to one of three models of instruction: mutual decision making (emphasized team approach; patient could adjust treatment based on results), didactic (nurse educator would make decisions based on results), and authoritarian (physician would make decisions based on results).
Participants performed blood glucose estimations four times daily over 2 weeks using a blood glucose monitor with memory but were not informed of the memory capacity.
Blood glucose results recorded in patient logbooks were compared with monitor records.
No difference was found in the validity of patients' records by instruction group.
The overall proportion of correctly recorded estimations was 86 percent; 70 percent of examinations were actually performed as requested and correctly recorded, and another 16 percent were correctly recorded as not done.
Conversely, 30 percent of scheduled examinations were not performed properly or were recorded incorrectly.
Compared with patients with type 2 diabetes, patients with gestational diabetes recorded a lower percentage of blood glucose estimations accurately.
Private health insurance was one of two predictors of greater validity of blood glucose records (the other was perceived high intelligence).
Although there were no direct financial disincentives for compliance with testing, as patients were not required to copay, health insurance status may represent a surrogate socioeconomic indicator.
Some patients may have experienced financial or social pressures that act as a barrier to successful completion of diabetes self-care activities.
6 tables, 8 references.
22 TITLE: Continuous Quality Improvement Can Improve Glycemic Control for HMO Patients with Diabetes.
O'Connor, P.J.; Rush, W.A.; Peterson, J.; Morben, P.; Cherney, L.; Keogh, C.; Lasch, S. Archives of Family Medicine.
5(9): 502-506.
October 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the impact of a continuous quality improvement (CQI) intervention on glycemic control of patients with diabetes mellitus attending a primary care clinic.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Use of a CQI intervention can improve glycemic control without increasing utilization or charges.
RECOMMENDATION: Health care providers should consider implementing CQI to improve adult diabetes care; several of the strategies developed by the CQI team may be useful for other primary care settings.
ABSTRACT: The authors analyzed the effect of implementing a CQI plan on glycemic control in patients with diabetes.
Patients were followed for 18 months at two clinics of a Midwest staff model health maintenance organization.
The intervention clinic had 4,100 patients; the comparison clinic, 4,700 patients.
The staff at the intervention clinic developed a computerized patient audit system and held monthly 1-hour CQI meetings.
The patient audit and review of the process of care led to a modified system using computerized printouts, targeting certain patients for special attention, and authorizing more aggressive outreach by resource nurses.
Patients were selected for readiness to undertake behavioral change and given appropriate levels of support.
Success of management was based on change in glycosylated hemoglobin (HbA1C) levels.
After intervention, in the CQI and comparison clinics, respectively, (HbA1C levels were acceptable, # 8 percent) in 51 versus 40 percent of patients, fair (8 to 10 percent) in 37 versus 33 percent, and poor ($ 10 percent) in 12 percent versus 27 percent (p = .008).
Intervention clinic patients had significant improvement in HbA1C levels relative to patients at the comparison clinic (p = .01).
Mean outpatient visits at the intervention and the comparison clinics were 7.86 and 7.40 prior to and 9.08 and 8.96 after initiation of CQI, respectively.
Mean charges for outpatient services were $991 and $958 prior to and $1,218 and $1,281 after initiation of CQI, respectively.
1 table, 25 references.
23 TITLE: A Cost-Benefit Analysis of Subcutaneous Insulin Pump Infusion Therapy for InsulinDependent Diabetes Mellitus.
Turkelson, C.M.; Coates, V. Abstract 195.
Annual Meeting of the International Society for Technology Assessment in Health Care.
11.
1995.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the costs of subcutaneous insulin pump infusion therapy and conventional therapy for type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Insulin pump therapy may be more cost-beneficial than conventional therapy, but it may take 9 years of treatment for this to be true.
How many patients will remain on pump therapy for this long is not known.
RECOMMENDATION: The conclusions of this study and other cost analyses of insulin pump therapy must be treated cautiously.
ABSTRACT: The authors used Markov analysis to compare the costs of insulin pump and conventional therapy.
Separate models were used to determine treatment-specific costs associated with diabetic nephropathy, retinopathy, and amputations.
When just retinopathy and amputations were considered, insulin pump therapy did not provide as great a cost-benefit as conventional therapy.
However, the savings associated with the third complication (diabetic nephropathy) were large enough for a greater cost-benefit to be realized for insulin pump therapy after 9 years of treatment when all three complications were considered simultaneously.
The authors note that the proportion of patients who should be given this type of therapy (or any form of intensive therapy) is unknown, as is the effectiveness of this therapy under regular clinical practice conditions.
24 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness Analyses of the Conversion of Patients with Non-InsulinDependent Diabetes Mellitus from Glipizide to Glyburide and of the Accompanying Pharmacy Follow-up Clinic.
Law, A.V.; Pathak, D.S.; Segraves, A.M.; Weinstein, C.R.; Arneson, W.H. Clinical Therapeutics.
17(5): 977987.
September/October 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To retrospectively evaluate the cost effectiveness of converting from glipizide therapy to glyburide therapy and of using a pharmacy follow-up clinic.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The conversion from glipizide to glyburide was cost effective, as was the follow-up clinic.
For every 1 percent of patients in the follow-up group who achieved good glycemic control, the Department of Veterans Affairs would spend only $1.01 more per patient on costs related to the follow-up clinic.
RECOMMENDATION: Due to its cost-effectiveness, the conversion from glipizide to glyburide is recommended in practice settings similar to that of the Department of Veterans Affairs.
Follow-up clinics are justifiable because they are cost effective and possibly increase patient compliance with the medication regimen or with nondrug factors (e.g., diet, exercise).
ABSTRACT: During a 6month period in 1993, the Department of Veterans Affairs Outpatient Clinic in Columbus, Ohio, converted patients with type 2 diabetes from glipizide to glyburide therapy as a way to reduce costs.
For this retrospective study, patients were divided into groups: I included all 730 patients while they were being treated with glipizide; II, 408 patients who converted to glyburide and returned to the follow-up clinic; III, 244 patients who converted to glyburide but did not return to the follow-up clinic (records were missing for the other 78 patients).
Cost data were gathered by examining the direct costs (in 1994 dollars) of the conversion and the follow-up clinic.
Costs common to all three groups were not included in the analysis.
The effectiveness measure was defined as the percentage of patients whose glycemic control was rated as good (i.e., fasting blood glucose 200 mg/dL or less).
The authors found that the average mean daily dose for glipizide was 1.82 to 1.85 times that for the glyburide dose.
Based on a daily dose of two 10mg tablets of glipizide (Group I) and two 5mg tablets of glyburide (Groups II and III), the cost savings to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the first year after conversion were $104,974.12 for Group II and $132,132.12 for Group III.
Although Group III achieved higher cost savings, Group II had a higher percentage of patients who achieved good glycemic control.
5 tables, 14 references.
25 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness Study of a Lipid-Lowering Therapy in Hyperlipoproteinaemia Type IIb and Type IV (Frederickson).
Bergemann, R.; Brandt, A.; Siegrist, W. PharmacoEconomics.
3(Supplement 2): 131-139.
February 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To conduct a cost-effectiveness analysis of four drugs (acipimox, bezafibrate, fenofibrate, and gemfibrozil) for treating patients with hyperlipoproteinemia types IIb and type IV (according to Frederickson), with and without type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: When hospitalization costs for treating gallstones are taken into account, acipimox is a more cost-effective therapy than the other three drugs.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: In this Swiss study, a computer model was developed of hyperlipoproteinemia types IIb and IV and their treatment.
The study was based on up to 7 years of therapy; in 10.5 percent to 11.8 percent of patients, according to the model, the therapy was interrupted because of adverse events or inadequate therapeutic effect.
Only direct costs were included (for drugs, physician visits, and hospitalizations for coronary vascular disease, coronary artery bypass graft surgery, peripheral arterial occlusive disease, and gallstone operations).
Calculations were based on computer-aided medical decision analysis and the Monte Carlo method; the discount rate was 5 percent per year.
Results from various epidemiologic and clinical trials were used to compare long-term outcomes.
Efficacy studies with long-term endpoints are available for the three fibrate drugs; the authors used various studies to derive estimates for the effects of acipimox.
Yearly costs of medication for the four drugs ranged from 434 to 446 Swiss francs.
Annual treatment costs with the three fibrate drugs were about 100 Swiss francs more than with acipimox for both kinds of hyperlipoproteinemia, with or without type 2 diabetes.
The risk of gallstones with the fibrate drugs was more than three times that for acipimox; this difference, according to the authors, explained the marked differences in the cost of therapy.
The authors state that estimated savings with acipimox were conservative because only the cost of the hospital stay was included; additional expenses for diagnosing and treating gallstones as well as for lost productivity were not included.
They note that the dosages (mg/day) in the study were specific to Switzerland: 500 for acipimox; 400, bezafibrate; 300, fenofibrate; and 900, gemfibrozil.
1 figure, 7 tables, 1 appendix, 38 references.
26 TITLE: The Costs and Effects of Two Different Lipid Intervention Programmes in Primary Health Care.
Tomson, Y.; Johannesson, M.; Åberg, H. Journal of Internal Medicine.
237(1): 1317.
January 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the costs and effects of two different intervention strategies for the nonpharmacological treatment of hypercholesterolemia.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Other prospective trial.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: There was no difference in the effectiveness of the two intervention strategies.
RECOMMENDATION: Of the two strategies, the low-intensity program is preferable from a Cost-effectiveness viewpoint.
ABSTRACT: All persons aged 25 to 54 years who resided in the catchment area of a health center south of Stockholm were invited to a health check; 2,338 were screened for hypercholesterolemia.
From a group of 372 persons found to have this disorder, the authors selected men and women with a serum cholesterol in the range of 7.07.8 mmol L-1.
Those with hypertension, diabetes mellitus, and ischemic heart disease were excluded.
The 92 persons who met all criteria were randomized to low-intensity (n = 45) or moderate-intensity (n = 47) intervention programs.
The low-intensity program focused on diet modification; participants were given brochures.
The moderate-intensity program, which followed Swedish national guidelines, also focused on diet modification but included more active involvement with the participant's general practitioner and with a dietitian.
Both groups were followed for a year and compared with respect to serum cholesterol concentration and treatment costs in Swedish crowns (SEK), using 1993 prices.
(Apart from the health care costs, the treatment costs for the patient included the time cost for the visits and travel costs to the health care center.)
Both intervention strategies resulted in small decreases (3.3 percent for low intensity, 3.7 percent for moderate intensity) in total cholesterol, with no significant difference between the groups.
The total cost per patient in the low-intensity group was SEK 753; in the mediumintensity group, SEK 3,614.
The authors estimate that if only 30 percent of the population aged 25 to 54 years in Stockholm county with hypercholesterolemia were discovered by the primary health care system and followed the dietary advice, the net savings with the lowintensity model (versus the moderate-intensity model) would be SEK 93 million.
5 tables, 10 references.
27 TITLE: The Development of Community Orientated Recommendations for Diabetes Care in South Auckland.
Wilson, P.; Simmons, D. New Zealand Medical Journal.
107(989): 456-459.
November 9, 1994.
OBJECTIVE: To describe the development of recommendations for preventing and controlling diabetes and its effects in South Auckland, New Zealand, a community in which diabetes is a major public health priority.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Historical review.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: The provision of scientifically derived data, followed by discussion of the data with community representatives and its subsequent dissemination throughout the community, has provided an opportunity to begin controlling diabetes in the South Auckland area.
RECOMMENDATION: Numerous recommendations are set forth in the body of the report.
ABSTRACT: South Auckland, New Zealand, a community with considerable socioeconomic deprivation, has many residents of Maori and Pacific Islander descent, two groups with a disproportionate risk for diabetes.
In 1990-1991 the South Auckland Diabetes Survey canvassed all general practitioners and practice nurses in that district on diabetes management and barriers to care.
Community experience was obtained from existing diabetes focus groups.
Patients and selected general practitioners were interviewed about barriers to care.
Additional interviews were conducted with physicians, dietitians, and others involved in diabetes care, and a 54-page preliminary information document was prepared.
A 12-member planning group found the document to be too long and technical; a 4-page summary was prepared and distributed to a variety of groups.
The next draft followed 12 meetings and extensive community consultation.
Sixty-eight recommendations were eventually made on diabetes care, including altering the environment, coordination and standardization, access, cost reduction, diabetes support groups, foot and eye care, diabetes in pregnancy and impaired glucose tolerance, and screening.
A cost-outcome evaluation of the plan suggested significant savings in direct health expenditure, and full funding was subsequently recommended.
1 table, 1 figure, 22 references.
28 TITLE: Diabetes in Urban African Americans: III.
Management of Type II Diabetes in a Municipal Hospital Setting.
Ziemer, D.C.; Goldschmid, M.G.; Musey, V.C.; Domin, W.S.; Thule, P.M.; Gallina, D.L.; Phillips, L.S.
American Journal of Medicine.
101(1): 25-33.
July 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To prospectively study the effectiveness of multidisciplinary, nonphysician, nonpharmacologic management in an urban outpatient setting of a largely African American group of patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Nonpharmacologic, nonphysician management of type 2 diabetes is effective in a socioeconomically disadvantaged population.
RECOMMENDATION: Further study is needed to identify risk factors for patient loss to follow-up.
ABSTRACT: The authors prospectively evaluated care provided to patients with type 2 diabetes in a municipal hospital clinic in Atlanta, Georgia; most study patients were African Americans and socioeconomically disadvantaged.
At an initial visit, the diagnosis was confirmed, family history obtained, patient education initiated, and a nurse practitioner or registered nurse assigned for follow-up; obese patients were instructed in a hypocaloric diet.
Drug therapy was initiated, adjusted, or eliminated based on fasting plasma glucose levels at each visit.
Data were analyzed for 325 patients who returned for follow-up visits at 2, 4, 6, and 12 months.
Patients were more likely to return if diagnosed less than 1 year previously, over age 55 years, or female; 80 percent missed at least 1 visit.
Compared with initial levels, both fasting plasma glucose and glycosylated hemoglobin improved significantly in the first 2 months (p 
Initially, 36 percent of obese patients were managed by diet only, 24 percent by sulfonylureas, and 40 percent by insulin.
After 2 months, 70 percent were managed by diet alone; at 6 months, 61 percent; and at 12 months, 55 percent.
Lean patients had little change in management over the 12 months.
Neither weight gain nor loss correlated with metabolic control at 12 months.
Keeping appointments correlated with better metabolic control.
Average cost per patient visit for physician and staff salaries, rent, utilities, and administrative overhead was $59 (1994 costs).
The program was effective for a socioeconomically disadvantaged population, but further study is needed to identify risk factors for patient loss to follow-up.
7 figures, 1 table, 37 references.
29 TITLE: Effect of Value-Added Utilities on Prescription Refill Compliance and Medicaid Health Care Expenditures: A Study of Patients with Non-Insulin Dependant Diabetes Mellitus.
Skaer, T.L.; Sclar, D.A.; Markowski, D.J.; Won, J.K. Journal of Clinical Pharmacy and Therapeutics.
18(4): 295-299.
August 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the effect of mailed prescription-refill reminders, specialized packaging, or a combination of both interventions on prescription refill compliance and health service utilization among patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Mailed prescription refill reminders, specialized packaging, or a combination of both significantly increased patient refill compliance.
Patients receiving both interventions also had decreased expenses for physician, laboratory, and hospital services.
RECOMMENDATION: Pharmacy-based value-added utilities should be used more under both public and private health insurance programs.
ABSTRACT: From 10 to 30 percent of patients with type 2 diabetes withdraw from prescribed treatment within 1 year of diagnosis; of the remainder, about 20 percent do not take enough prescribed medication to maintain their blood glucose at satisfactory concentrations.
A randomized trial was undertaken to determine the effects of valued-added pharmacy services on the compliance of type 2 patients with prescription refills and their use of health services.
The 1-year study included 258 Medicaid beneficiaries with previously untreated type 2 diabetes.
Patients lived in South Carolina, were less than 65 years old, had prescriptions to administer 5 mg glyburide twice daily, and were not to have received an alternative sulfonylurea or used insulin after receipt of the initial glyburide prescription.
The patients were assigned to one of four groups: a control group (standard pharmacy care), standard pharmacy care plus mailing of a reminder 10 days before the refill date, standard pharmacy care plus unit-of-use packaging, and standard pharmacy care plus both mailed refill reminders and unit-of-use packaging.
The medication possession ratio (MPR) was used to compare groups; the MPR is the days' supply of medication obtained by the patient relative to the days in the study period (optimal = 1.00).
Dispensing of drugs was authorized in 30-day supplies.
Analysis of data after 1 year revealed that patients receiving mailed prescription refill reminders, unit-of-use packaging, or a combination of both achieved a significant (p 
The MPR for those receiving both interventions was significantly higher than for the groups receiving one intervention.
Multivariate regression analysis revealed that patients receiving both interventions had significant (p 
2 tables, 22 references.
30 TITLE: Efficacy of Insulin and Sulfonylurea Combination Therapy in Type II Diabetes.
A Meta-Analysis of the Randomized Placebo-Controlled Trials.
Johnson, J.L.; Wolf, S.L.; Kabadi, U.M. Archives of Internal Medicine.
156(3): 259-264.
February 12, 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the efficacy of combination therapy with insulin and sulfonylurea in type 2 diabetes by performing a meta-analysis of studies that met strict criteria.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Formal meta-analysis of randomized clinical trials.
Methodology: Data analysis.
Perspective: Health care system CONCLUSION: Combination therapy improves glycemic control while lowering daily insulin dosages and without adversely affecting body weight.
In developing countries, combination therapy is far less expensive than insulin monotherapy.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: Forty-three citations were obtained from a search of the MEDLINE database from January 1980 through March 1982; 16 studies with a total population of 351 participants were analyzed -- these studies met strict criteria for study design and outcome measures.
The meta-analysis showed that the combination of insulin and sulfonylurea improves metabolic control for periods of at least 16 weeks.
This improved metabolic control is achieved despite a decrease in daily insulin dose and does not result in a significant change in body weight.
Combination therapy appears to be more expensive than mono-therapy with insulin, as the total monthly cost for combination therapy is about $60 to $85, versus $20 for two daily injections of a total dose of 100 U of intermediate-acting insulin.
However, for patients using insulin monotherapy, the costs of insulin administration are higher, more frequent glucose monitoring may increase expense, and more frequent office and emergency department visits may be needed.
In addition, money could be saved by substituting a first-generation sulfonylurea such as tolazamide for a second-generation drug.
However, second-generation sulfonylureas are dropping in price.
In developing countries, the cost of sulfonylureas is minuscule compared with insulin.
7 tables, 61 references.
31 TITLE: Evaluation of a Practice-Based Programme of Health Checks: Financial Cost and Success at Risk Detection.
Sacks, G.; Marsden, R. Journal of the Royal College of General Practitioners.
39(326): 369-372.
September 1989.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the efficacy and cost of a screening program for cardiovascular risk factors among patients in a large group practice in Oxford, England.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The screening program increased recording of risk factors but its cost was not fully met by reimbursement for salaries or services.
RECOMMENDATION: To avoid the financial disincentive to general practitioners to provide such preventive medicine programs, salaries for program staff should be completely reimbursed by the government.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the efficacy and cost of a screening program to identify patients at risk for cardiovascular disease in a large suburban group practice in Oxford, England.
Costs for the unfunded program were to be recouped through fees generated by referrals for tetanus and polio shots and cervical cytology exams.
Of 1,470 patients invited to participate in the nurse-run health checks, 1,382 (94.0 percent) participated.
In this group, 66 cases of previously undiagnosed hypertension and 11 cases of previously undiagnosed diabetes were identified.
Just over one-third (34.9 percent) of patients were overweight and 27.0 percent smoked.
Total cost of the program was £ 11,785, of which £ 11,510 was for staff salaries.
Estimated service fees generated totaled only £ 1,167, which was adjusted to £ 1,342 to reflect patients who had died or left the area.
With £ 8,057 of income added to this amount from 70 percent reimbursement of salaries, the screening program operated at a net cost to the practice of £ 2,386, or £ 1.73 per patient.
This outcome casts doubt on the results of other studies that have suggested that the costs of government-recommended prevention programs can be fully recouped through item-of-service payments.
1 figure, 2 tables, 14 references.
32 TITLE: The Feasibility of a Potentially "Ideal" System of Integrated Diabetes Care and Education Based on a Day Centre.
Day, J.L.; Johnson, P.; Rayman, G.; Walker, R. Diabetic Medicine.
5(1): 70-75.
January 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the feasibility of a new system of clinical and educational care designed to replace traditional diabetes clinics.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The new integrated diabetes care system improved quality of care of patients without incurring major costs.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated a new, integrated diabetes care and education program in Ipswich, England, at a new day facility.
Staff from a traditional hospital clinic were reorganized and the role of the specialist nurse changed to providing primary counseling (physicians also provided care in the new center).
Clinic hours were revised and a new appointment system created.
After 1 year, the new program was found to have provided a pleasant environment for diabetes care and education, largely eliminated excessive waiting time, established continuity in consultation, and made available a more comprehensive and systematized educational program.
Mean glycosylated hemoglobin levels of patients did not differ significantly by whether they saw the physician or specialist nurse.
These results were achieved without major additional expenses: building maintenance, £ 3,000; nursing staff, £ 2,275; phlebotomist services, £ 300; and receptionist services, £ 2,476.
Most costs were within original financial targets.
In addition, the British Diabetic Association provided a 3-year support grant of £ 17,129.
Capital costs of the new building and equipment (total of £ 88,000) were considered small when spread over the potential lifetime of the building.
6 tables, 12 references.
33 TITLE: Fructosamine or Glycated Haemoglobin as a Measure of Diabetic Control? Allgrove, J.; Cockrill, B.L. Archives of Disease in Childhood.
63(4): 418-422.
April 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether measuring fructosamine concentration is a suitable alternative or useful adjunct to the measurement of glycated hemoglobin A1 (HbA1C) in the routine management of children with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: In children with diabetes, fructosamine values were well correlated with HbA1C levels, but only when values outside the normal range were not excluded.
Measuring fructosamine is not a direct substitute for assaying HbA1C.
RECOMMENDATION: Use of fructosamine concentration for routine diabetes control monitoring, with HbA1C assayed under select conditions, should be considered a cost-saving alternative to routine HbA1C monitoring.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the potential of measuring fructosamine concentration as an alternative or adjunct to HbA1C measurement in routinely managed children with diabetes.
HbA1C, fructosamine, and total proteins were assayed in 61 children with diabetes and 30 normal children.
Linear regression analysis showed a highly significant correlation in children with diabetes between HbA1C and fructosamine; however, when values outside the normal range were excluded, the significant relation- ship disappeared.
The same results were obtained when HbA1C values were plotted against the fructosamine:protein ratio.
In three newly diagnosed patients whose disease was being brought under control, fructosamine concentrations were lower than expected; in one deteriorating patient, values were higher than expected.
The authors conclude that fructosamine is not a direct substitute for HbA1C.
The routine addition of a fructosamine test to a HbA1C measurement would increase overall costs of assessing diabetic control (by 10 to 15 percent if the reagents are made up in the laboratory) and cannot be justified.
Conversely, substituting fructosamine for HbA1C monitoring would provide only small savings in a pediatric clinic and cannot be justified on clinical grounds.
Using fructosamine for most routine monitoring, with HbA1C assayed on selected occasions, would reduce overall costs of assessing diabetic control while retaining the flexibility of having both assays available.
2 tables, 4 figures, 12 references.
34 TITLE: Importance of Outpatient Supervision in the Prognosis of Juvenile Diabetes Mellitus: A Cost/Benefit Analysis.
Deckert, T.; Poulsen, J.E.; Larsen, M. Diabetes Care.
1(5): 281284.
September/October 1978.
OBJECTIVE: To investigate whether outpatient follow-up visits to a subspecialized clinic have a favorable effect on survival of patients with type 1 diabetes, and to evaluate whether the cost of this effort is in reasonable proportion to the benefit obtained.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: A clear relationship was found between the frequency of outpatient visits to a subspecialized clinic and the duration of survival with diabetes.
Outpatient supervision in a subspecialized clinic involves relatively little cost compared with the benefit derived.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The study consisted of 180 insulin-treated patients with diabetes (89 females, 91 males) who had been referred for admission to the Steno Memorial Hospital in Denmark before their 15th year of diabetes.
Sixteen patients could not be traced after 40 years of diabetes; the others were followed until death or until 40 years of diabetes.
Subsequent to the first hospital admission, 77 patients never attended follow-up in the outpatient clinic; the others attended 1 to 145 times in the course of their first 20 years of diabetes.
(Only outpatient visits that took place within these first 20 years were included in the authors' analysis.)
The aim of the outpatient supervision was to keep the patient symptom free and socially well adapted, to avoid long periods of poor metabolic regulation, to prevent insulin reactions, and to adapt the treatment to intercurrent diseases.
The authors found a clear correlation between the number of outpatient visits and the duration of survival with diabetes: patients seen more than 20 times in the outpatient clinic in the course of their first 20 years of diabetes had a longer survival with diabetes (mean, 38.5 years) than patients who did not have outpatient follow-up (mean, 26.6 years); this difference was highly significant (p = 0.0001).
Those in the first group averaged 4.4 outpatient follow-up visits annually over a 12.5-year period (first visit was at an average of 7.5 years of follow-up).
If regular follow-up for these patients produced 11.9 additional years of work, total benefit from years gained working (1976 earnings of an unskilled laborer were used) and hospital admissions eliminated was estimated to be $100,656.
In contrast, cost per patient (1976 prices) of running the clinic for 40 years was estimated at $10,468.
1 figure, 1 table, 2 references.
35 TITLE: Inpatient or Outpatient Initiation of Insulin Therapy: Experience and Cost Effective Analysis in a Suboptimal Clinical Setting.
Mengistu, M.; Lungi, Y.; Mamo, F. Tropical and Geographical Medicine.
43(1-2): 180-183.
January-April 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the safety, feasibility, and cost-effectiveness of initiating insulin therapy in an outpatient setting in an area where day-care centers for persons with diabetes do not exist.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Initiation of insulin therapy in the outpatient setting was safe, feasible, and cost effective even though the setting was suboptimal.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors report initiation of insulin therapy in a suboptimal clinical setting in Ethiopia for patients with newly diagnosed diabetes mellitus.
Between 1985 and 1989, 53 patients with diabetes and no impending or established ketoacidosis began insulin therapy as outpatients.
Treatment began on a Monday to allow sufficient working days for patient education.
Patients returned to the outpatient clinic for 3 to 4 weekly visits, then were followed every 2 to 3 months.
Outpatient costs included clinic staff salaries and taxi fare; examining room rent was excluded as minimal.
Results were compared with 51 retrospectively chosen inpatients hospitalized for insulin initiation because of distance from the clinic or existing practice.
Inpatient costs included medical and nonmedical staff and the declarable cost of beds, which included food and other utilities.
Costs for third-class (n = 46), second-class (n = 4), and first-class (n = 1) beds were 2.2, 12.0, and 30.0 Birr, respectively (2.07 Birr = $1 U.S.).
Mean blood glucose levels before and after treatment were 357.9 and 197.6 mg/dl, respectively, for inpatients and 325.4 and 205.8 mg/dl, respectively, for outpatients.
Mean weight before and after treatment was 44.8 and 49.1 kg, respectively, for inpatients and 53.3 and 56.4 kg, respectively, for outpatients.
Mean insulin dose for inpatients and outpatients was 29.4 " 14.7 units and 28.7 " 9.2 units, respectively.
Mean duration of hospitalization for inpatients was 24.3 " 9.2 days.
Total cost per outpatient visit was 6.8 Birr; total cost per inpatient day was 24.3 Birr.
Total outpatient and inpatient costs were 1,346.2 and 30,115.0 Birr, respectively.
The savings realized with outpatient care equaled $14,000 (U.S. dollars).
Outpatient initiation of insulin therapy is safe, acceptable, and cost effective.
3 tables, 10 references.
36 TITLE: Insulin Injection Technique Can Be Taught without Hospitalization.
Lester, F.T.; Demissie, Y.; Negash, A. Ethiopian Medical Journal.
28(4): 191-195.
October 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the feasibility of outpatient instruction in insulin injection technique for patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Outpatient instruction in insulin injection technique is safe and feasible.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the feasibility of outpatient instruction in insulin injection technique as an alternative to the traditional Ethiopian practice of inpatient instruction for patients with diabetes.
A total of 144 patients were instructed in insulin injection technique over a 1-year period at an Addis Ababa hospital; 85 of these patients were instructed while hospitalized and 59 were instructed as outpatients.
Patients were instructed in a single group by two nurses; sessions were held 6 days a week.
Outpatients needed an average of 4.7 days to learn the technique; an additional 3 to 4 weeks of frequent monitoring was needed to attain control.
No severe hypoglycemic reactions were seen among the outpatients.
Instruction was unsuccessful for two very symptomatic outpatients.
Six to 16 months after the instruction period, 62.7 percent of the outpatients but only 50.6 percent of the inpatients were still attending the clinic.
Hospitalization is disruptive and costly and diabetic control achieved there is artificial, i.e., control has not been achieved in the patient's natural environment.
3 tables, 6 references.
37 TITLE: Insulin-Glyburide Combination Therapy for Non-Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus: A Long-Term Double-Blind, Placebo-Controlled Trial.
Casner, P.R. Clinical Pharmacology and Therapeutics.
44(5): 594-603.
November 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether the combination of a sulfonylurea agent and insulin can improve glycemic control in patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The combination of a sulfonylurea agent and insulin did not improve glycemic control during the study year, and the extra cost and inconvenience of combination therapy would not make it worthwhile except in a few select patients.
RECOMMENDATION: Providing combination therapy in a pulse form instead of continually may be more effective and may need to be studied; insulin clamp studies are required to address insulin sensitivity.
ABSTRACT: Sixty-four patients with insulin-treated type 2 diabetes were treated with a combination of insulin and oral sulfonylurea therapy or insulin and a placebo in a double-blind controlled trial conducted over 12 months.
There were no significant differences between the two groups of patients except for age; the control group was 4.2 years older.
In the treatment group, fasting blood glucose concentrations were significantly below those for the control group only at 3 and 4 months.
Insulin dose for the treatment group was significantly below the dose for the control group at month 8 only.
In comparisons of the two groups, glycohemoglobin values were significantly lower for the control group at months 3 and 6 only; C-peptide levels were significantly higher in the treatment group at 3 and 9 months only.
At each visit, placebo or glyburide was titrated to higher doses, with both groups attaining maximal dosage (20 mg/day).
Oral glucose tolerance test results did not significantly differ between groups except at 3 months, when the control group's were higher.
The treatment group was divided into responders (a fasting blood glucose concentration # 140mg/dL on at least 3 visits and a 25 percent reduction in total daily insulin requirements sometime during the study) and nonresponders.
Forty-two percent were responders; 29 percent of these responders received a 
By the end of the study, the daily insulin dose for responders was about 50 percent lower than that of the control group and non-responders, suggesting that combination therapy may improve insulin sensitivity and enhance insulin secretion.
Patients in the treatment group experienced no serious side effects from the combination of insulin and glyburide.
Combination therapy may increase the cost of treatment by nearly 50 percent, and its effect appears to be transitory in most patients.
Patients most likely to benefit are those who show an increase in C-peptide levels when taking oral hypoglycemics.
6 figures, 2 tables, 41 references.
38 TITLE: Less Expensive, Reliable Blood Glucose Self-Monitoring.
Spraul, M.; Sonnenberg, G.E.; Berger, M. Diabetes Care.
10(3): 357-359.
May-June 1987.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether splitting test strips for capillary blood glucose selfmonitoring will permit reliable measurement of blood glucose levels.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Cutting capillary blood glucose test strips (Chemstrips bG) in half had no effect on the reliability of self-assessment of blood glucose levels and halved the cost of the test.
RECOMMENDATION: All patients should be advised to split their test strips (Chemstrips bG) to reduce the costs of blood glucose self-monitoring.
ABSTRACT: The authors tested the reliability of using split test strips to self-assess blood glucose levels by experimenting with Haemoglukotest 20-800 (Chemstrips bG) test strips.
Ten participants (patients and laboratory personnel) who were trained in reading test strips but had never used split test strips were each asked to test blood samples using 10 full-size strips, 10 strips halved mechanically with a splitting device, and 10 strips halved manually with scissors.
Results were compared with plasma glucose concentrations measured in a Beckman glucose analyzer.
The correlation coefficients (r) values for uncorrected plasma glucose concentrations were 0.95 for full-thickness strips, 0.966 for mechanically split strips, and 0.966 for manually split strips, respectively.
The mean absolute deviation from the reference value and standard error (in mg/dl) was 17 " 2 for full strips, 17 " 1 for mechanically split strips, and 17 " 1 for manually split strips.
There was no significant difference between the three self tests and the laboratory analyzer by analysis of variance (p = .98), variance between participants (p = .12), or interrelationship between participants' readings and the three methods (p = .61).
Test strips reliably monitor blood glucose concentrations, and halving the strips with scissors cuts the cost of monitoring in half without reducing reliability.
Patients should be advised to use split test strips to save money.
1 figure, 1 table, 5 references.
39 TITLE: Lifetime Benefits and Costs of Intensive Therapy as Practiced in the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial.
The Diabetes Control and Complications Trial Research Group.
Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA).
276(17): 14091415.
November 6, 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To examine the costs and benefits of intensive treatment of type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Intensive therapy for those meeting eligibility criteria would improve quality and length of life and represents a good monetary value.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors developed a Monte Carlo simulation model to estimate the lifetime benefits and costs of conventional and intensive insulin therapy for patients with type 1 diabetes.
The intensive therapy regimen was designed to achieve blood glucose levels as close to the nondiabetic range as possible with three or more daily insulin injections or with treatment with an insulin pump, self-monitoring of blood glucose levels four times daily, and monthly outpatient visits with a multidisciplinary team.
Conventional therapy consisted of one or two injections each day, daily self-monitoring, and quarterly visits.
Data were collected as part of the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial (DCCT) and supplemented with data from other clinical trials and epidemiologic studies.
The authors assumed that approximately 17 percent of the U.S. population with type 1 diabetes (120,000 persons) would qualify for enrollment in the DCCT.
They included all direct medical costs for the Cost-effectiveness analysis but did not include direct nonmedical costs (e.g., transportation, lodging) or potential production losses arising from disease related absence from work, long-term disability, or premature death.
The costs of conventional and intensive therapy were based on actual resources used in the DCCT.
The Monte Carlo model simulated the course of the patient's disease over his or her expected lifetime.
The authors found that implementing intensive rather than conventional therapy among the 120,000 persons meeting DCCT criteria would gain 920,000 years of sight, 691,000 years free from end stage renal disease, 678,000 years free from lower extremity amputation, and 611,000 years of life, at an additional cost of $4 billion (1994 U.S. dollars with future costs and effects discounted 3 percent) over the lifetime of the group.
The incremental cost per year of life gained was $28,661.
The incremental cost per quality-adjusted life-year gained with intensive treatment was $19,987.
2 figures, 4 tables, 49 references.
40 TITLE: Management of Patients with Diabetes by Nurses with Support of Subspecialists.
Peters, A.L.; Davidson, M.; Ossorio, R.C. HMO Practice.
9(1): 8-13.
March 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To describe a program for managing patients with diabetes via diabetes nurses within a health maintenance organization (HMO) system, and to report on the costeffectiveness of the program.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Patients achieved significant decreases in glycated hemoglobin levels; the program appears to have achieved substantial cost savings by avoiding acute hospitalizations for diabetes in 244 patients.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: Staff at the Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles developed a program to manage diabetes patients called the Comprehensive Diabetes Care Service.
Diabetes nurse specialists, supervised by diabetologists, provide diabetes and lipid management per protocols.
Staffing ratios are one nurse and one staff assistant for each 250 patients with diabetes and one diabetologist for each 1,000 patients.
An independent practice association at the hospital with approximately 150 physicians and a capitation contract with 12 HMOs (as of 1986) was persuaded to participate in the diabetes program.
The program began in February 1987 with a capitated population of approximately 8,000; in July 1994, that population was approximately 65,000.
Actual patients with diabetes followed in the program numbered 236 in January 1990 and 754 in December 1993.
A diabetologist sees the patient in conjunction with the nurse initially and annually.
The nurse sees the patient quarterly and follows a defined format at each visit.
Patients are referred to a dietitian at entry and are seen by an ophthalmologist at their first visit.
A computer system was designed to improve patient management.
The authors found that glycated hemoglobin levels improved significantly (p 
The authors estimated that over a 4-year period (1990 to 1993), 244 patients who would probably have been hospitalized by other physicians at the hospital were not because of the intensive outpatient follow-up available.
The authors estimated the potential net cost savings to be $568,721 over the 4 years.
1 figure, 2 tables, 9 references.
41 TITLE: Nursing Case Management: An Innovative Model of Care for Hospitalized Patients with Diabetes.
Edelstein, E.L.; Cesta, T.G. Diabetes Educator.
19(6): 517-521.
NovemberDecember 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the effect of using a diabetes team with a case management approach to quality of care and length of hospital stay.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Length of hospital stay was reduced for patients with a primary and secondary diagnosis of diabetes whose care was managed by the team.
Blood glucose control before discharge was at least fair in more than 98 percent of team patients before discharge.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors in New York City who did diagnosis of diabetes; 49, a admitted for blood glucose reported on 160 patients admitted to Beth Israel Medical Center not have private physicians.
Eighty-five patients had a principal secondary diagnosis of diabetes; and 26 were antepartum patients control.
A team consisting of a case manager, diabetes nurse educator, diabetologist, and nutritionist managed the care of these patients.
Consultations per patient totaled 7.5; average length of stay of the patients with a principal diagnosis of diabetes was 4.14 days, 58 percent lower than the hospital's 1990 average for such patients.
For patients with a secondary diagnosis of diabetes, the average length of stay was 14 percent below the 1990 Beth Israel average.
The study readmission rate was 7.33 percent within 30 days of discharge, but readmissions were unrelated to diabetes.
The team patients had excellent (28.7 percent), good (26.9 percent), or fair (42.7 percent) blood glucose control prior to discharge.
3 figures, 14 references.
42 TITLE: Pointers to Preventing Hyperglycaemic Emergencies in Soweto.
Buch, E.; Irwig, L.M.; Huddle, K.R.; Krige, L.P.; Krut, L.H.; Kuyl, J.M. South African Medical Journal.
64 (18): 705-709.
October 22, 1983.
OBJECTIVE: To analyze emergency hospital admissions for hyperglycemia in Soweto, South Africa, including associated costs; to assess the use of health services by emergency patients before and after hospital admission.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Health service costs for admissions for hyperglycemic emergencies in Soweto were estimated as at least 462,000 rand (South African currency) in 1981; many admissions were preventable, and patient use of health resources and self-monitoring prior to and after admission were inadequate.
RECOMMENDATION: Ambulatory services for patients with diabetes should be developed and upgraded in Soweto, with the following specific considerations: improved patient education, allocation of special staff for hyperglycemic emergencies, establishment of a registry for such emergencies, improved records systems, and application of complianceimproving strategies.
ABSTRACT: The authors reviewed the incidence of admissions for hyperglycemic emergencies during a 2-month period in 1981 at Baragwanath Hospital in Soweto, the associated costs, and the use of health services by patients with diabetes prior to and following admission.
Problems related to providing diabetes care are compounded in Soweto by poor socioeconomic conditions.
During the study period, 60 patients were admitted for hyperglycemic emergencies; 15 (25 percent) died in the hospital; just 3 of the deaths may have been unrelated to the emergency.
Of 56 patients interviewed, 7 percent were previously undiagnosed with diabetes.
Average hospital stay was 20 days, and the estimated cost of treating the emergency admissions during the study period was 77,000 rand.
Of the 49 patients known to have diabetes prior to admission, only 19 (39 percent) had attended any health services 3 or more times during the 3 months before admission, and 25 percent had not attended a health service at all.
(Three attendances would be the minimum to receive adequate medication.)
Of the 36 patients with whom follow-up interviews were conducted 3 months after discharge, 12 (33 percent) had been readmitted.
Extrapolating from the study sample, the cost of hyperglycemic emergencies to Soweto's health services was estimated as at least 462,000 rand for 1981.
5 figures, 3 tables, 7 references.
43 TITLE: Precision and Costs of Techniques for Self-Monitoring of Serum Glucose Levels.
Chiasson, J.L.; Morrisset, R.; Hamet, P. Canadian Medical Association Journal.
130(1): 3843.
January 1984.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the accuracy and cost of blood glucose monitoring techniques involving a glucose oxidase reagent strip with or without a reflectance meter.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The techniques evaluated, particularly those involving reflectance meters, compared favorably with standard laboratory methods, were easy to perform, and were less expensive.
RECOMMENDATION: Blood glucose monitoring using a glucose oxidase reagent strip and reflectance meter should be considered a feasible, cost-effective alternative to standard laboratory testing.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the accuracy and cost of seven blood glucose monitoring techniques available for patient self-monitoring; they also examined the correlation between serum glucose concentrations obtained.
The blood glucose techniques, which involved a glucose oxidase reagent strip with or without a reflectance meter, were evaluated in more than 100 patients with or without diabetes.
Two of the techniques were tested by members of a rotating staff of hospital nurses, all seven by a nurse specifically trained for the task, and four of the seven by the patients themselves.
Results were compared with reference values determined by the hexokinase method in a hospital biochemistry laboratory using the Simultaneous Multiple Analysis, Computerized (SMAC) or Autoanalyzer II (AAII) (Technicon Instruments Corporation, Tarrytown, New York) assays.
Costs were evaluated via a survey of drugstore prices.
Techniques involving a reflectance meter showed excellent correlation with the laboratory reference method (r2 = 0.85 to 0.96) for all three types of testers.
Correlation with the reference standard was poorer for techniques not involving a reflectance meter (r2 = 0.69 to 0.90); correlation improved when the techniques were performed by a specially trained nurse.
Reflectance meters ranged in price (Canadian dollars) from $290 to $565.
Costs for bottles of 25 reagent strips ranged from $13 to $19.80.
Costs for each determination using the self-monitoring techniques ranged from $0.46 to $0.99; these values were up to three times less expensive than the laboratory methods ($1.86 for the SMAC and $1.04 for the AAII).
These blood glucose monitoring techniques, particularly those using a reflectance meter, were reliable, easily performed by patients, and less expensive per determination when compared with laboratory testing.
In contrast, the correlation between urine and glucose levels was poor (r2 = 0.21).
4 figures, 12 tables, 19 references.
44 TITLE: Randomized Controlled Multicentre Evaluation of an Education Programme for Insulin-Treated Diabetic Patients: Effects on Metabolic Control, Quality of Life, and Costs of Therapy.
de Weerdt, I.; Visser, A.P.; Kok, G.J.; de Weerdt, O.; van der Veen, E.A. Diabetic Medicine.
8(4): 338-345.
May 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the effect of an education program for insulin-treated patients with diabetes on their metabolic control, quality of life, and costs of therapy.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The education program had no effect on metabolic control, quality of life, and costs of therapy, although the patients significantly increased their level of self-monitoring blood glucose and diabetes knowledge.
The authors suggest various reasons for the failure to find effects.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: This study was conducted in 15 randomly selected hospitals in The Netherlands.
Control patients were taken from 5 hospitals and intervention patients (experimental) from the other 10.
In five of the experimental hospitals the program was led by a health care worker; in the other five, by a fellow patient.
A total of 625 patients were asked to participate, 558 (89 percent) of whom agreed.
Each group had 40 to 50 patients.
The patient characteristics of the groups (age, occupational status, duration of diabetes, duration of insulin use, and number of daily injections) did not differ significantly.
Patients in the experimental group were evaluated immediately before and after the education program and at 1 and 6 months following the program's conclusion.
Patients in the control group were assessed twice (at 6- to 7-month intervals).
At each evaluation, participants completed a questionnaire and a blood sample was taken.
The effect of the program on metabolic control (glycosylated hemoglobin, serum fructosamine concentration, number and severity of hypoglycemic reactions, and clinical signs of poor control), quality of life (Affect-Balance Scale and subjective social indicators), and costs of therapy (hospitalizations, doctor visits, medication, self-testing, sick days, and cost of education program) was assessed.
No significant effect from the education program on any one of these variables could be found, although there was significant improvement in self-care and diabetes knowledge.
This lack of effect could be due to the quality of the education program, short follow-up of the study, the lack of integration of the education program in standard therapy, the lack of follow-up of the education given, or the lack of concurrent changes in diabetes therapy.
4 tables, 30 references.
45 TITLE: A Risk-Benefit Assessment of Conventional versus Intensive Insulin Therapy.
Reichard, P. Drug Safety.
10(3): 196202.
March 1994.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the benefits of intensive insulin therapy for type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Intensified insulin therapy leads to a slowing down or halting of microvascular complications in patients with type 1 diabetes, including those with diabetes of short duration and those with longer term diabetes and nonproliferative retinopathy.
RECOMMENDATION: An intensified treatment program is generally indicated for the majority of adults with type 1 diabetes; such treatment should start before the complications become too advanced.
ABSTRACT: The author explores whether intensified insulin treatment to lower blood glucose concentrations is effective in reducing diabetes complications by addressing five questions: (1) Is there an association between blood glucose concentrations and complications? (2) Is the association causal? (3) Are there any adverse effects of intensified treatment? (4) Is intensified treatment acceptable? and (5) How great could the gains be with general acceptance and execution of the treatment program? By reviewing various studies, most notably the Stockholm Diabetes Intervention Study and the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial, the author finds the following: Lower blood glucose concentrations are associated with reduction of complications affecting the eyes, kidneys, and nerves.
Prospective, randomized studies are needed to answer the question of a causal association.
The chief adverse effects of intensified insulin treatment are weight gain and an increased frequency of serious hypoglycemic episodes.
Intensified treatment is acceptable to patients.
The gains are very large, not only for the individual patient, but also for society as a whole.
The author speculates that if 400,000 patients were put on an intensive treatment program, 64,000 who would develop nephropathy if conventionally treated would not do so, and 100,000 would not need laser treatment for retinopathy who otherwise would.
Implementing an intensified treatment program for type 1 diabetes would bring a significant reduction of serious complications and a gain in terms of patient discomfort and cost.
2 figures, 32 references.
46 TITLE: Utility of Serum Fructosamine as a Measure of Glycemia in Young and Old Diabetic and Non-Diabetic Subjects.
Negoro, H.; Morley, J.E.; Rosenthal, M.J. American Journal of Medicine.
85(3): 360-364.
September 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the utility of a serum fructosamine assay as a measure of glycemia.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Serum fructosamine was comparable to other measures of glycemia.
RECOMMENDATION: Serum fructosamine should be considered superior to measures of other glycosylated proteins because of its automaticity, reproducibility, and lower cost.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the utility of serum fructosamine as a measure of glycemia by comparing it with other standard glycemic indices: glycosylated hemoglobin, glycosylated albumin, and fasting glucose.
Participants were 145 adults in six categories, including two groups of healthy persons (aged 22 to 50 and 64 to 86) without diabetes; one group with chronic debilitating illness (aged 60 to 91); otherwise healthy persons in a maintenance methadone program; and two groups (mean ages: 48 and 70 years) of patients with diabetes.
Blood samples were collected at 8 a.m. after a 12-hour fast.
Serum fructosamine detected glycemia as well as the established tests, and fructosamine concentrations correlated well with serum glycosylated hemoglobin, glycosylated albumin, and fasting glucose.
Fructosamine concentrations were not significantly affected by any of a large battery of medications or by large differences in plasma lipid levels.
Age did not affect serum fructosamine concentration, which makes this a particularly useful test for older persons with diabetes.
Serum fructosamine is also amenable to automated determination and is far simpler and less expensive than assays for glycosylated proteins.
The current charge to patients for assays is $6.50 for plasma glucose, $8.00 for fructosamine, $26.00 for glycosylated hemoglobin, and $31.00 for glycosylated albumin.
2 figures, 3 tables, 27 references.
47 TITLE: Variation in Office-Based Quality: A Claims-Based Profile of Care Provided to Medicare Patients with Diabetes.
Weiner, J.P.; Parente, S.T.; Garnick, D.W.; Fowles, J.; Lawthers, A.G.; Palmer, R.H. Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA).
273 (19): 1503-1508.
May 17, 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To demonstrate that profiling of claims data can be used as an ongoing method to support ambulatory care quality improvement, to measure the quality of officebased care provided to elderly patients with diabetes, and to identify factors associated with higher or lower conformance to recommended criteria of care.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Claims review.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The care of elderly patients with diabetes is not meeting nationally recommended guidelines; screening rates are particularly low in rural areas.
Examining Medicare claims has great potential for measuring patterns of care.
RECOMMENDATION: Programs should be established to disseminate clinical practice guidelines relevant to primary care of diabetes and further research should be conducted to delineate variations in office practice patterns.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the quality of office-based care provided to elderly patients with diabetes.
Data were derived from review of all Medicare claims (Parts A and B) in Alabama, Iowa, and Maryland for July 1990 to June 1991 for patients aged 65 years and over.
Four services/procedures were identified as quality indicators for diabetes: three (hemoglobin A1c measurement, ophthalmologic exam, and total cholesterol measurement) were to be performed at least annually; the fourth, blood glucose measurement, was identified as a limited-use procedure.
Across the three states, only 16.3 percent of patients with diabetes underwent hemoglobin A1c measurement, 45.9 percent received an ophthalmologic exam, and 55.1 percent underwent cholesterol measurement at least once during the year.
In contrast, four-fifths (80.5 percent) of patients underwent blood glucose measurement.
In almost all instances, practice patterns varied significantly across the three states, even after controlling for practice and patient characteristics.
With the exception of ophthalmologic exams, rates of procedures were significantly lower in rural areas.
Results demonstrate that elderly patients with diabetes are not receiving optimal care; a large gap exists between national practice guidelines and actual primary care practice.
Clinical practice guidelines need to be more widely disseminated.
Further research is needed to identify the causes of variation across office practices in order to design quality improvement programs.
3 tables, 38 references.
Nutrition Care 48 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Medical Nutrition Therapy Provided by Dietitians for Persons with Non-Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
Franz, M.J.; Splett, P.L.; Monk, A.; Barry, B.; McClain, K.; Weaver, T.; Upham, P.; Bergenstal, R.; Mazze, R.S. Journal of the American Dietetic Association.
95(9): 1018-1024.
September 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To report on the cost-effectiveness of nutrition care by practice guidelines for patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The implementation of nutrition guidelines in type 2 diabetes can be met with a reasonable investment of resources and improvement in metabolic control.
RECOMMENDATION: Additional research should be conducted before more intensive nutrition intervention can be recommended as the preferred approach for patients with type 2 diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The authors conducted a cost-effectiveness analysis of 179 adult patients with type 2 diabetes randomized to basic nutrition care (n = 85) or nutrition care following practice guidelines (n = 94).
Basic care included just one visit from the dietitian; practice guidelines, three or more.
The defined outcome for the cost-effectiveness analysis was the effect of nutrition care on glycemic control at 6 months as measured by changes from baseline in levels of fasting plasma glucose and glycated hemoglobin.
Costs were limited to those for direct health care as documented through an accounting approach.
The per-patient cost (1993 dollars) of providing basic care was $41.95; the comparable cost for guidelines care was $112.07.
Each mg/dL of change in the fasting plasma glucose concentration after 6 months of intervention required an investment of $5.75 in the basic group and $5.84 in the guidelines group.
When net costs were considered (per-patient costs minus cost savings due to changes in therapy), the required investments were $5.32 and $4.20 for the basic and guidelines groups, respectively.
Changes in medical therapy resulted in a per-patient cost savings over 12 months of $31.49 in the guidelines group and $3.13 in the basic group.
Sensitivity analysis showed that the relative cost-effectiveness of guidelines care versus basic care was unchanged by dietitian salary or additional laboratory testing.
Results show that nutrition therapy can be provided in a cost-effective manner.
Additional information is needed, however, before more intensive nutrition intervention can be recommended as the preferred approach for type 2 patients.
5 tables, 26 references.
49 TITLE: Effects of Diet and Exercise Interventions on Control and Quality of Life in NonInsulin-Dependent Diabetes.
Kaplan, R.M.; Hartwell, S.L.; Wilson, D.K.; Wallace, J.P. Journal of General Internal Medicine.
2(4): 220-228.
July-August 1987.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the impact of diet and exercise on glycemic control and quality of life in patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Patients in the diet-plus-exercise group significantly improved their quality of life and significantly decreased their glycosylated hemoglobin (HbA1C) over 18 months.
RECOMMENDATION: Additional studies of nonpharmacologic intervention for patients with type 2 diabetes are needed using larger sample sizes.
ABSTRACT: The authors report a study of 70 volunteers with type 2 diabetes who were randomized to one of four types of nonpharmacologic management: diet, exercise, diet and exercise, or education (control group).
All participants were given the same diet (the exchange diet recommended by the American Diabetes Association) and asked to attend 10 consecutive weekly meetings; exercise routines were prescribed individually based on graded exercise tests.
The intervention groups underwent behavioral modification sessions that included goal-setting and diet and/or exercise plans.
The control group received lectures from a variety of health care specialists but no specific behavior modification plans.
After 3 and 6 months, the diet group had significantly greater weight loss than the control group (2.52 kg loss versus a gain of 1.37 kg), but at 18 months, the diet group had regained an average of 1.81 kg.
Also at 18 months, the diet-plus-exercise group had reduced its HbA1C levels from 9.18 to 7.70 percent, versus an increase from 8.21 to 8.57 percent for the controls (p 
Changes in HbA1C in the diet-only and exercise-only groups were not significant compared with controls.
Over 18 months, quality of life improved for participants in the combined intervention group, improved less markedly for the diet group, remained relatively static in the exercise group, and deteriorated for the control group.
Estimated direct cost of the diet-plusexercise intervention was $1,000 per participant per year; this program yielded 0.092 years of well-being over that obtained by the control group, which was actually less than zero.
Thus, the cost of producing a well year was $10,870.
2 figures, 4 tables, 19 references.
50 TITLE: Reliability and Cost of Diabetic Diets.
Tunbridge, R.; Wetherill, J.H. British Medical Journal.
2(701): 78-80.
April 11, 1970.
OBJECTIVE: To ascertain the adherence of patients with diabetes mellitus to the recommended diet, and to calculate the cost of maintaining the recommended diet.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Thirty percent of patients adhered to within 10 percent of their recommended diet.
The cost of the recommended diet was higher than the cost of food for the general population.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors reported on adherence to prescribed diets for 63 patients attending the diabetes clinic at the General Infirmary in Leeds, England, for a single week in the spring of 1968.
Dietary control was satisfactory (90 to 100 percent within guidelines) for 30 percent of patients, tolerable (80 to 89 percent within guidelines) for 38 percent, and "hopeless" (less than 80 percent within guidelines) for 32 percent.
Less than one-third of women (n = 35) and men (n = 28) followed satisfactory diets.
Adherence was best among participants aged 40 years and under and worst among those aged over 60 years.
Dietary control was poorer among participants treated by diet plus oral hypoglycemic agents than in those treated by dietary control with or without insulin; it was poorer among those diagnosed within 10 years than among those diagnosed for more than 10 years.
Dietary control was best with diets of 1,201 to 1,999 calories and worst with 1,200 calories or less.
Diabetes control was satisfactory (blood glucose between 50 and 200 mg/ml, no ketonuria, weight steady) in 42 percent of patients with satisfactory diets, 33 percent of those with tolerable diets, and 40 percent of those with hopeless diets.
The estimated cost per patient per week to follow an ideal diet was 44 shillings and 1 penny, versus 38 shillings, 4 pennies for the general population.
Low-income patients continue to have difficulty purchasing the food to maintain a correct diet.
7 tables, 5 references.
51 TITLE: Spin-Off Cost/Benefits of Expanded Nutritional Care.
Davidson, J.; Delcher, H.; Englund, A. Journal of the American Dietetic Association.
75(3): 250-257.
September 1979.
OBJECTIVE: To describe and evaluate an expanded nutrition care program developed in a hospital diabetes unit; to compare projected costs of continuing the preintervention program with actual costs incurred with the expanded intervention.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Over an 8-year period, the expanded nutrition care program saved the hospital $379,988 from reduced use of insulin (1973 to 1978 only) and no use of oral agents and over $3,700,000 from decreased incidence of lower extremity amputations and severe diabetic ketoacidosis.
Net savings for the year 1978 were $216,699.
RECOMMENDATION: Registered dietitians should collaborate with physicians and nurses to organize health care teams that will provide expanded nutrition care programs for all Americans who have diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The authors describe the outcome of an expanded nutrition care program developed over an 8-year period (1971-1978) in the Grady Memorial Hospital Diabetes Unit in Atlanta, Georgia; Grady is the primary teaching hospital of the Emory University School of Medicine.
Projected costs of continuing the pre-1971 program, which consisted of basic nutrition care with high use of insulin and oral agents, were compared with actual costs of the expanded program.
The latter program emphasized short-term fasts, hypocaloric diets, patient education and follow-up, discontinued oral agents, and limited use of insulin.
Total costs of the pre-1971 program were estimated at $125,863 per year, including $43,176 for oral agents, $23,723 for insulin, $23,963 for the basic nutrition program, and $35,000 for personnel, facilities, and supplies.
Estimated total cost of the expanded nutrition care program for the year 1978 was $615,164, including approximately $500,000 for personnel, facilities, and equipment; $73,391 for expanded nutrition care; and $41,774 for insulin.
Despite these increased costs, the hospital had an estimated net savings of $216,699 for that year, as it saved more than $706,000 because of decreased prevalence of severe diabetic ketoacidosis and severe lower extremity amputations.
During the 8-year study period, decreased hospitalization for severe diabetic ketoacidosis and lower extremity amputation provided the hospital with gross savings of more than $3.7 million.
2 figures, 9 tables, 15 references.
Educational Programs 52 TITLE: Comparison of Five Glucose Meters for Self-Monitoring of Blood Glucose by Diabetic Patients.
Gifford-Jorgensen, R.A.; Borchert, J.; Hassanein, R.; Tilzer, L.; Eaks, G.A.; Moore, W.V. Diabetes Care.
9(1): 70-76.
January-February 1986.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the accuracy, ease of operation, and cost of five self-monitoring blood glucose meters.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: For four of the five meters, adjusted blood glucose values were not significantly different from laboratory values.
Various advantages and disadvantages were found relative to price, calibration, strip utilization, and ease of operation.
RECOMMENDATION: Patient education is absolutely necessary for accurate use of the blood glucose meters.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed five kinds of currently marketed meters for home use: Accu-Chek (Bio-Dynamics, Inc.); Glucochek II bG (Medistron/Larken), with Chemstrip bG reagent strips; Glucochek II-Dextro (Medistron/Larken), with Dextrostix reagent strips; two Glucometer (Ames Division, Miles Laboratories) reflectance photometers, with calibration either by fluids or special chips; and Glucoscan II (LifeScan, Inc.).
Fasting blood samples were taken from patients (n = 37) at the University of Kansas College of Health Sciences and Hospital and tested immediately on the meters.
Blood samples were also taken to the laboratory for serum testing according to the glucose-oxidase method.
When unadjusted meter readings of whole blood glucose were plotted against laboratory values, three of the meters had a 35-49 percent inaccuracy rate; for the other two, inaccuracy rates were 65 and 70 percent.
After adjustment of the whole blood glucose values to match the serum values, only the Glucochek II-Dextro with Dextrostix reagent strips had significantly different values.
(A technical revision by the manufacturers may have changed this meter's performance.)
For blood glucose ranges of both 60-180 mg/dL and 181-300 mg/dL, all meters except Glucoscan II were at least 95 percent accurate.
For values of 301-400 mg/dL, both the Glucometer (with "CHIP" calibration) and the Glucoscan II were less than 95 percent accurate.
Prices approximated $150 for the Accu-Chek and the Glucometers, $140 for the Glucochek models, and $178 for the Glucoscan II; 404 to 704 for reagent strips.
The Glucoscan II and the two Glucochek models were factory calibrated; the other models required periodic recalibration.
7 figures, 3 tables, 32 references.
53 TITLE: Conference Report: Approaches to the Treatment of Type II Diabetes and Developments in Glucose Monitoring and Insulin Administration.
Bloomgarden, Z.T. Diabetes Care.
19(8): 906-909.
August 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To review presentations at conferences held in 1996 concerning treatment of type 2 diabetes and developments in glucose monitoring systems and insulin administration.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Conference summary.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: None.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The author reviews 1996 conference presentations concerning treatment of type 2 diabetes, glucose monitoring, and insulin administration.
In 1992, medical costs for diabetes were 12 percent of total health care costs, but only 8 percent of patient visits were to diabetes specialists.
For each 1 percent fall in hemoglobin A1c (HbA1C), development of proliferative retinopathy and nephropathy falls 50 percent.
Diet and exercise are effective in controlling blood glucose and in decreasing the risk of developing type 2 diabetes.
Elizabeth Barrett-Connor suggested that achieving glycemic control is not a key to decreasing mortality.
A speaker on managed care stated that protocol-based care is needed, and that outcomes and costs should be followed.
Researchers in England are looking at the effect that controlling blood glucose and hypertension has on outcome for patients with type 2 diabetes.
A new study of the effects of obesity and exercise on development of type 2 diabetes is about to start.
According to one speaker, Julio Santiago, most self-glucose monitoring is a waste of money.
He indicated that an annual investment of $2,000 per patient would decrease mortality substantially in patients with diabetes (supporting data are available).
Santiago proposed that therapeutic programs use algorithms based on the HbA1C, the fasting blood glucose value, and the avoidance of hypoglycemia.
Another speaker stated that home blood glucose meters are inaccurate, especially at glucose concentrations less than 75 mg/dL.
An implantable insulin pump was found to decrease blood glucose and HbA1C, but infections, mechanical failures, and cost were problems.
Inhalation, trans-dermal delivery, and sonophoresis are being investigated, as is the use of computer programs for records management and treatment advice.
4 references.
54 TITLE: The Diabetes Education Study: A Controlled Trial of the Effects of Diabetes Patient Education.
Mazzuca, S.A.; Moorman, N.H.; Wheeler, M.L.; Norton, J.A.; Fineberg, N.S.; Vinicor, F.; Cohen, S.J.; Clark, C.M. Diabetes Care.
9(1): 1-10.
January-February 1986.
OBJECTIVE: To assess, in the context of a randomized clinical trial, the impact of an education program for adult patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Patients in the intervention education group made lasting changes in skills and self-care behavior and achieved modest improvement in glycemic control.
RECOMMENDATION: More research in similar and different settings is needed to determine whether the patients from this study are truly representative of patients with type 2 diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The authors report the results of the Diabetes Education Study (DIABEDS) developed by the Indiana University School of Medicine.
The DIABEDS is a randomized, controlled trial of patient and physician education in managing diabetes.
The 532 patients recruited from a clinic population into the study were primarily elderly, female, black, and obese; 95 percent had type 2 diabetes.
Patients could be assigned to intervention groups (patient education, physician plus patient education) or control groups (control group, physician education group).
Staff were randomly assigned to care groups.
Patients in the intervention groups (n = 263) received interactive instruction over an 8-week period on diabetes and its complications, use of medications, the effects of diet and exercise, foot care, urine testing, and behavior modification; they also received meal plans and menus as well as a home visit.
Patients in the control groups (n = 269) received the standard institutional patient education.
Patients were assessed at entry into the study and at postintervention periods ranging from 6 to 14 months.
Two hundred seventy-five patients took part in postintervention assessment.
On most knowledge items, there was little difference between intervention and control groups; intervention patients did better in listing causes of hyperglycemia, knowledge of urine test implications, and knowing the diabetes exchange list system.
Intervention patients were significantly better on two of four urine testing skills as well as on food partitioning and/or weighing.
In addition, they made more improvement in fasting glucose concentrations, glycosylated hemoglobin, body weight, diastolic and systolic blood pressure, and serum creatinine concentrations.
Intervention patients also had statistically better diet compliance and safety habits.
8 tables, 13 references.
55 TITLE: Effect of Diabetes Education on Self-Care Metabolic Control and Emotional WellBeing.
Flack, J.R. Diabetes Care.
13(10): 1094.
October 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To rebut the assertion by Rubin et al.
(Diabetes Care.
12:673-679.
1989) that educational programs with a few sessions spread over a long time period are probably less effective than a program of 5 consecutive days.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Diabetes education programs that spread the education process over a period of time (up to 6 weeks) may be more effective than five consecutive-day programs.
RECOMMENDATION: Future studies on diabetes programs need to focus on who should teach what, when and how it should be taught, and how to assess outcome.
ABSTRACT: The author questions the contention of Rubin et al. that educational interventions for persons with diabetes that consist of a few sessions spread over a long period will probably be less effective than the 5 consecutive-day program of Rubin et al.
A study presented by Beeney et al. (1988) at the 13th International Diabetes Federation meeting compared four diabetes education programs over 3 years.
At 12 months after entry, knowledge improvement was independent of the program format.
Psychological adjustment was better in patients for whom the program was prolonged for up to 6 weeks.
Beeney et al. concluded that the demonstrated benefits of extended formats must be rationalized with the size and requirements of the population served to determine the most cost-effective program.
They noted that shorter programs have higher patient turnover.
The author suggests that diabetes education needs more study in terms of who is to teach what, when and how it should be taught, and how to assess a suitable outcome.
In a reply, Rubin et al. agree that extended education programs can be effective.
They state that the content and time devoted to teaching are the most important factors in a program, but they indicate that the point of diminishing return for the amount of education has not been identified.
They recommend that future studies seek to identify the content and format that produce the best results.
6 references.
56 TITLE: Effect of Diabetes Education on Self-Care, Metabolic Control, and Emotional WellBeing.
Rubin, R.R.; Peyrot, M.; Saudek, C.D. Diabetes Care.
12(10): 673-679.
NovemberDecember 1989.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether an intensive comprehensive educational program will improve emotional well-being, self-care practices, and metabolic control in patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Prospective trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: An intensive comprehensive educational program improves emotional wellbeing, self-care practices, and metabolic control, especially in patients whose functional status in these areas is poor.
RECOMMENDATION: Randomized, controlled studies are needed to assess more definitively the effectiveness of diabetes education programs.
ABSTRACT: Participants (n = 165) in this study at the Johns Hopkins Diabetes Center were enrolled in a week-long outpatient diabetes education program designed to improve self-care practices, emotional well-being, and metabolic control.
The study population was 70 percent white, mean age was 47.4 " 16.5 years, and 59 percent had some college education; most participants were overweight.
Sixty-three percent were taking insulin, and 62 percent had type 2 diabetes.
Disease complications in the study group included neuropathies, retinopathy, vascular complications, and infections.
Baseline data were collected on emotional status, selfcare behaviors, diabetes knowledge levels, and glycemic control as measured by hemoglobin A1c tests (HbA1C).
One hundred twenty-four (75 percent) of the participants completed a 6month follow-up questionnaire, and 71 (43 percent) had HbA1C tests at 6-month follow-up.
At both program end and 6-month follow-up, participants had significantly improved from baseline on all measures of emotional well-being as well as on knowledge.
At 6 months (versus baseline), bingeing was lower (p 
Program effects were unrelated to demographic or disease characteristics but were strongly related to initial status.
On six different measures, participants who entered the program in the worst condition improved the most; those who entered in the best condition improved little, if at all.
1 figure, 3 tables, 28 references.
57 TITLE: The Effectiveness of Diabetes Education for Non-Insulin-Dependent Diabetic Persons.
Scott, R.S.; Beaven, D.W.; Stafford, J.M. Diabetes Educator.
10(1): 36-39.
Spring 1984.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the effectiveness of a patient education program for patients with type 2 diabetes in improving their understanding and management of the disease and their use of hospital and specialist services.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The patient education program did not result in sustained improvement in glycemic control or long-term behavior change.
RECOMMENDATION: The effectiveness of any education program for people with type 2 diabetes should be carefully assessed, as considerable investment of time by health professionals may not result in substantial benefits.
ABSTRACT: This two-part study was carried out at the Christchurch Diabetes Center in New Zealand.
In the first part, individuals with type 2 diabetes were referred to a diabetes education program where they were randomly assigned to a treatment (n = 32) or control (n = 28) group.
The treatment group entered an education program immediately, while the control group entered it four weeks later.
Researchers assessed participants' knowledge and anxiety levels and glycemic control at the time of referral and 4 weeks later, before the control group had begun the education program.
At the latter time, assessment indices (plasma glucose; urinary glucose; glycosylated hemoglobin; and knowledge, anxiety, and depression levels) in the control group showed no significant improvement except for a small increase in the knowledge score (p 
In the treatment group, knowledge (p 
Comparison of improvement in the control and treatment groups found significant differences in favor of the treatment group for knowledge, plasma glucose, glycosylated hemoglobin, and anxiety.
In the second part of the study, 30 patients received education at referral and 26 patients received education after a 4-week delay.
Glycemic control was assessed at referral, at the end of the program, and 4 weeks after the program's completion.
In both groups, the mean values for blood glucose and glycosylated hemoglobin were not significantly different 4 weeks after program conclusion from the values at referral.
2 tables, 7 references.
58 TITLE: Effects of Educational Interventions in Diabetes Care: A Meta-Analysis of Findings.
Brown, S.A. Nursing Research.
37(4): 223-230.
July-August 1988.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the effects of educating patients with diabetes on their knowledge, self-care behavior, and metabolic control.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Formal meta-analysis of randomized controlled trials.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Patient education has positive outcomes in adults with diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: More research is needed to develop the statistical basis for meta analysis, and researchers must make data available in a form that permits comparisons with other studies.
ABSTRACT: The author used meta-analysis to explore several issues: What is the magnitude of the effect of patient teaching in adults with diabetes? What outcomes from teaching in this population have been documented in terms of patient knowledge, self-care, and metabolic control? Is there a relationship between outcome effects and various study characteristics (e.g., research design, type of instruction)? Data were derived from published and unpublished sources; studies had to have a control group (n = 27) or a preintervention control phase (n = 20) for comparison of results.
Studies had been published between 1954 and 1986 (50 percent after 1982).
The studies included 3,605 patients (range: 8 to 373), 236 effect sizes, and 52 pooled effect sizes.
(An effect size is the difference between the experimental and control group in standard score form.)
The author found that patient teaching appears to enhance patient outcomes in diabetes management; she determined that the weighted mean effect size across all studies was 0.33 (i.e., outcomes that are 0.33 standard deviation units higher than those for the comparison group).
The effect of teaching on patient knowledge was moderate to large; on skill performance it was small to low-moderate.
There was a small effect of teaching on weight loss and a large effect on dietary compliance.
Teaching also had a positive effect on metabolic control.
The only study characteristic to be correlated with overall weighted mean effect size was attrition.
3 tables, 59 references.
59 TITLE: Evaluating the Costs and Benefits of Outpatient Diabetes Education and Nutrition Counseling.
Kaplan, R.M.; Davis, W.K. Diabetes Care.
9(1): 81-86.
January-February 1986.
OBJECTIVE: To analyze the studies that supported the resolution of the American Diabetes Association recommending third party payment for outpatient education and nutrition counseling of patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The reports cited by the American Diabetes Association in support of third party reimbursement for outpatient education and nutrition counseling of patients with diabetes do not meet criteria to measure benefits and rarely include the full costs of such programs.
RECOMMENDATION: The first criterion for evaluating education and nutrition counseling should be evidence that they improve health status.
Scientifically sound experiments evaluating education of patients with diabetes should be undertaken.
ABSTRACT: The authors analyzed the scientific validity of 13 studies cited by the American Diabetes Association in support of its recommendation for third party coverage of outpatient education and nutrition counseling of patients with diabetes.
Only two of the reports mentioned control or comparison groups, and in neither case were the patients randomly assigned to such groups.
Only four studies provided health care cost accounting, and two of these studies did not include the intervention costs.
Some of the studies seemed to show an increase in costs with intervention.
None of the studies included discount analyses and most failed to report net differences in costs.
Some studies did not report costs of related services or program implementation costs.
In some cases, apparent savings were in fact cost shifting, which may not equate to cost reduction.
None of the studies estimated indirect patient costs, such as travel time, changes in diet, and lost work.
Only one study reported costs of medications and educational materials.
Costs of continuing intervention were not estimated.
Attrition was high in the five studies that reported it, and follow-up was nonexistent or not reported in half of the studies.
Researchers extrapolated limited results nationwide, and the programs varied widely.
None of the reports meets accepted criteria to establish the cause and effect of education intervention.
Well-designed experiments are needed to assess the direct and indirect program costs, the savings attributable to the program, and the net program benefits.
Costs must be based on all patients who receive service, adequate patient follow-up, and discounted future benefits.
1 table, 23 references.
60 TITLE: Evaluation of a Structured Treatment and Teaching Program for Non-Insulin- Treated Type II Diabetic Outpatients in Germany after the Nationwide Introduction of Reimbursement Policy for Physicians.
Gruesser, M.; Bott, U.; Ellermann, P.; Kronsbein, P.; Joergens, V. Diabetes Care.
16(9): 1268-1275.
September 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the practicability and efficacy of a structured treatment and teaching program for patients with type 2 diabetes in a routine primary care office setting.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The structured treatment and teaching program improved the quality of care, as evidenced by decreased patient weight, less use of oral antidiabetic agents, and improved metabolic control.
RECOMMENDATION: The participating physicians recommended a higher reimbursement rate for providing a structured treatment and patient education program for their type 2 diabetes patients.
ABSTRACT: In 1991, nationwide insurance coverage of a standard treatment and teaching program for outpatients with type 2 diabetes was introduced in Germany.
Physicians' fees and the costs of teaching materials were reimbursed.
Physicians and office staff were required to complete a training course to obtain reimbursement.
The authors interviewed 127 office-based physicians in Hamburg who had completed the training course (42 percent were internists and 58 percent were general practitioners) 12 months after the training, and information was collected on 179 patients who participated in group treatment and teaching programs, which were provided in 17 randomly selected office practices.
Of the 127 physicians, 122 (96 percent) rated the training course content as good and useful, 2 reported they learned nothing new, and 3 rated the content as useless or poor.
Sixty-one percent of the physicians had implemented at least one treatment and teaching course in their practice at the time of the evaluation (median: 12 months after completing the training course).
Information on patients completing the program showed substantial improvements in quality of treatment and self-care practices.
The number of patients who tested their urine for glucose at least twice a week rose from 3 percent to 70 percent.
Improved dietary habits led to a reduction in body weight, which resulted in decreased use of oral antidiabetic agents and improved metabolic control.
The net cost for the program was $35.80 (U.S. dollars) per patient in year 1, with an expected savings of $13.20 per patient per year beginning in year 2.
These savings do not include anticipated reductions in the costs associated with treating long-term complications of diabetes.
Most of the physicians found reimbursement for offering the program to be either "extremely inadequate"or "inadequate."
1 figure, 4 tables, 40 references.
61 TITLE: Obesity and the U.S. Navy [letter].
Yowell, S.K. Military Medicine.
156(12): A10.
December 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To show that the authors of an earlier article (Hoiberg, A.; McNally, M.S. Military Medicine.
156(2): 76-82 [abstract 222]) did not provide support for the Health and Physical Readiness Program of the U.S. Navy.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of study.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The referenced authors' support for the Navy's Health and Physical Readiness Program was not justified by their study.
RECOMMENDATION: A weight control program's efficacy, potential benefits, and adverse effects should be examined, as should its cost of screening and monitoring.
ABSTRACT: This letter to the editor offers several criticisms of Hoiberg and McNally's article on overweight patients in the U.S. Navy.
The author points out that obesity was not defined in Hoiberg and McNally's article and that data were obtained from sources that did not verify diagnoses.
Furthermore, the control group was not age-matched with the obese group.
The author also questions diagnoses of gout, hypertension, gallbladder disorders, and diabetes on admissions of obese patients.
He points out that admissions for a diagnosis like diabetes are more likely to have obesity mentioned in the workup than are admissions for diagnoses where weight is thought to be irrelevant.
Referring to the authors' finding of a high concordance of alcoholism and obesity, the writer notes that during the study period almost all obesity therapy was offered by alcohol rehabilitation staff; a co-diagnosis of alcoholism was often needed to gain admission.
Before implementing weight control programs and examining their potential savings in hospitalization, he suggests looking at their efficacy, potential benefit, adverse effects, and the cost of screening and monitoring.
62 TITLE: A Randomized Study of the Effects of a Home Diabetes Education Program.
Rettig, B.A.; Shrauger, D.G.; Recker, R.R.; Gallagher, T.F.; Wiltse, H. Diabetes Care.
9(2): 173178.
March-April 1986.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the effectiveness of a home-based individualized instruction program in diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Six months following enrollment, patients in the intervention group (home teaching) had significantly greater knowledge and skill scores than the control group (no teaching).
Hospitalization rates, diabetes-related emergency room visits, physician visits, and sick days did not differ significantly by group at 12-month follow-up.
RECOMMENDATION: Because diabetes is a chronic disease, new guidelines for diabetes patient education should incorporate a long-term management plan in conjunction with periodic reinforcement of self-care knowledge and skills.
ABSTRACT: In this Nebraska-based study, home health nurses provided up to 12 educational visits for 193 patients randomly assigned to the intervention group.
The 180 patients in the control group, while not receiving home visits, were free to participate in other types of health education.
The two groups did not vary in terms of demographic composition, diabetes duration, diabetes type, or previous diabetes education.
A survey instrument developed by the Nebraska Diabetes Demonstration Project was used to measure self-care knowledge and skills.
At 6-month follow-up, total mean knowledge scores were 60.2 for the intervention group, 51.6 for controls (p = 0.001); total mean skill scores were 74.8 for the intervention group and 72.6 for controls, a difference that was statistically significant (p = 0.04) but not considered meaningful.
At 12-month follow-up, hospitalization rates did not differ by group on any of three types of admission: nondiabetes-related, nonpreventable diabetes-related, and preventable diabetes-related.
There was no difference between the groups in mean foot appearance score at 6-month follow-up.
The authors warn of possible bias in the selection of study participants, as those who chose to participate may have been more highly motivated than those who did not (about 70 percent of patients who were asked to participate actually did).
Such a bias could have resulted in recruiting patients for whom teaching would have added little to present knowledge and skill levels.
In addition, persons hospitalized with a diabetes-related condition were more likely to have been identified as eligible to participate than those hospitalized with a condition not overtly related to diabetes.
5 tables, 13 references.
63 TITLE: Reduced Hospital Utilization and Cost Savings Associated with Diabetes Patient Education.
Sinnock, P. Journal of Insurance Medicine.
18(3): 24-30.
Summer 1986.
OBJECTIVE: To review data demonstrating the impact of patient education programs on health care services used by patients with diabetes; to review the system for assuring the quality of such programs and the current status of reimbursement by third party payers for diabetes outpatient education.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Diabetes patient education programs can dramatically reduce the physical and economic costs of diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: The insurance industry and diabetes community should work together to monitor and improve diabetes patient education programs.
ABSTRACT: Numerous studies have demonstrated an association between diabetes patient education and reduction in hospitalizations, resulting in cost savings.
A 2-year study of 6,000 persons with diabetes who participated in a patient education program at Los Angeles County Hospital demonstrated a 73 percent decrease in hospitalizations; cost savings over the study period were estimated at $1.8 million.
A program at Grady Memorial Hospital in Atlanta showed a 65 percent decrease in admissions for diabetic ketoacidosis and an estimated savings of $3.5 million over 8 years.
In Maine, a Centers for Disease Control state-based program demonstrated a 32 percent reduction in hospitalizations among 1,000 participants, with net savings estimated at $293 per participant per year.
A 51 percent reduction in hospitalization from diabetic acidosis and infection and a 63 percent reduction in emergency room visits were seen in a Rhode Island program.
Estimated cost savings associated with this intervention were $355 per participant per year.
The quality of diabetes education programs in the United States has varied, but it is hoped that the implementation of the National Standards for Diabetes Patient Education Programs (National Diabetes Advisory Board 1983) will improve this situation.
Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield and selected private insurers reimburse for outpatient education in 14 states, Medicare in 15 states, and Medicaid in 6 states.
Several states are considering legislation that would mandate coverage for self-management education programs for diabetes outpatients.
1 figure, 2 tables, 30 references.
64 TITLE: Third Party Reimbursement for Diabetes Mellitus: Outpatient Education: A Year's Progress.
Peddicord, M.; Lyons, A.; Tobin, C.; Vinicor, F. Diabetes Spectrum.
3(1): 9-12.
January-February 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the progress made in obtaining third party reimbursement for outpatient education programs for patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Secondary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Survey.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Between 1986 and 1989, the number of states reporting reimbursement for diabetes outpatient education increased.
Medicare reimbursement increased because of a national policy statement from the Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA).
An increase in private insurer reimbursement is credited to consumer demand and Medicare policies.
There was little change in Medicaid programs.
RECOMMENDATION: Continued consumer advocacy, emphasis on quality, providing additional cost and cost-savings information, and ongoing exploration of strategies and alternatives are recommended to continue the progress made in reimbursement policies.
ABSTRACT: Reimbursement for outpatient education programs for patients with diabetes is increasing across the United States.
Four states have enacted legislation covering reimbursement of these programs.
Medicare reimbursement has increased for outpatient education programs because of a national policy statement issued by the HCFA defining Medicare's criteria for reimbursement of prevention, including diabetes education.
Private insurers, including HMOs, have shown the greatest increase in third party reimbursement for outpatient education programs, primarily because of consumer demand and Medicare policies.
Medicaid programs, which are regulated by the states, have shown the least change toward third party reimbursement.
Among many insurers there is an acceptance of education as a part of treatment, and not solely as a preventive measure.
Most reimbursed outpatient education programs are either hospital-based or based in rural health clinics.
Programs formally recognized by an accrediting or recognition body at the state or national level are more likely to be reimbursed.
Concerns regarding reimbursement for outpatient education for patients with diabetes include the fact that only one or two education programs per state currently receive reimbursement, that the prospective payment system is causing more programs to shift from an inpatient to outpatient setting, and that little progress has been made in reimbursement for free-standing education programs.
1 figure, 3 tables, 3 references.
Tertiary Intervention Eye Care 65 TITLE: Cost Savings Associated with Detection and Treatment of Diabetic Eye Disease.
Javitt, J.C. PharmacoEconomics.
8 (Supplement 1): 33-39.
1995.
OBJECTIVE: To estimate current and potential savings in the United States and Sweden from screening and treating retinopathy in persons with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Treatment of retinopathy in patients with diabetes mellitus yields substantial savings of sight years and money.
RECOMMENDATION: Eye care for patients with diabetes must emphasize patient identification, carefully maintained follow-up, and prompt, appropriate treatment.
ABSTRACT: The author describes the use of the PROPHET modeling system, a program designed to model the progression of a chronic, irreversible disease, to estimate savings from recruiting, screening, and treatment programs for diabetic eye disease.
Data from crosssectional and longitudinal studies and clinical trials are used in the model.
The analysis derives the costs of screening and treatment from average Medicare charges for 1990; savings as well as costs are expressed in 1990 U.S. dollars using a discount rate of 5 percent.
An annual federal expenditure of $14,296 is predicted for blind persons with diabetes under 65 years of age, just $32 (not counting Medicare, Social Security, income tax exemption) for those 65 and over.
Based on studies by Klein et al. (1987) in Wisconsin, the implementation rate of eye screening is currently 60 percent.
Even at this suboptimal level, screening and treatment for eye disease in patients with diabetes generates annual savings of $350 million to the federal budget and 100,000 person-years of sight.
Each additional person (beyond the 60 percent level) enrolled in appropriate screening and treatment is associated with net lifetime savings of $9,571 (type 1 diabetes) or $973 (type 2 diabetes).
The Swedish Council on Technology Assessment in Health Care repeated this analysis and found that 60 percent implementation of screening could potentially save 22 million SEK.
Their analysis found that savings associated with detection and treatment were 10 times greater than costs.
The authors of the present study found that changing the frequency of screening for patients with no or mild background retinopathy from 1 to 2 years does not reduce years of sight saved and reduces screening costs if the sensitivity of eye screening is 80 percent or greater.
3 figures, 43 references.
66 TITLE: Cost-Benefit Analysis of Diabetic Eye Disease.
Matz, H.; Falk, M.; Gottinger, W.; Kieselbach, G. Ophthalmologica.
210(6): 348-353.
1996.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the costs of blindness caused by diabetes with the costs of screening and treatment of retinopathy associated with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Screening for blindness saves more money than it costs.
RECOMMENDATION: All patients with diabetes should be screened for retinopathy and optimal therapy should be initiated.
ABSTRACT: The authors calculated the cost-benefit of screening and testing of diabetes- associated eye disease in the state of Tyrol, Austria.
Current and new cases of severe retinopathy (proliferative retinopathy or clinically significant macular edema) were calculated to be 2,147 and 252, respectively.
Without proper intervention, all 252 persons with incident cases would be expected to go blind within 10 years, vision could be retained in at least one eye in 179 cases with proper treatment, and blindness could be delayed an average of 3 years in patients for whom it is unavoidable.
Costs of blindness included disability payments and allowances; exemptions from telephone, television, and radio fees; tax exemptions; financial aid based on reduced earnings and disability; and early retirement pensions.
The anticipated costs of blindness were ATS 19 million overall, of which ATS 14.6 million was considered preventable, assuming 100 percent ability to diagnose severe retinopathy and macular edema and 100 percent ability to treat these conditions at an optimal time.
Cost was based on 10-year life expectancy at onset of severe retinopathy, duration of blindness ranging from 2.5 to 8.5 years, sex, age, employment status, type of diabetes, and correlation of minimum retirement age with life expectancy.
In Tyrol, 16,913 persons would require annual eye examinations (cost: ATS 5,191,445) and 2,147 persons would require examinations 4 times per year (ATS 3,022,547).
Laser coagulation or vitrectomy plus examinations would cost the national health care system ATS 8,560,089 and private insurance ATS 2,119,566 (only 17.7 percent of the population has supplemental private insurance).
Up to ATS 3.9 million can be saved through adequate screening and treatment to prevent blindness.
1 figure, 5 tables, 25 references.
67 TITLE: Cost-Effective Screening for Retinopathy Using a Nonmydriatic Retinal Camera in a Pre-paid Health-Care Setting.
Peters, A.L.; Davidson, M.B.; Ziel, F.H. Diabetes Care.
16(8): 1193-1195.
August 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the effectiveness of a nonmydriatic retinal camera as a screening tool for serious retinopathy.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The nonmydriatic retinal camera was highly sensitive in detecting serious retinopathy.
RECOMMENDATION: The nonmydriatic retinal camera should be considered an easy-touse, inexpensive component of screening strategies for retinopathy.
ABSTRACT: The authors evaluated the effectiveness of the Canon CR4-45 nonmydriatic retinal camera as a screening tool for retinopathy.
Nurse clinicians took retinal photos of the 522 patients in a diabetes program affiliated with a health maintenance organization at their initial and annual visits.
The degree of retinopathy as assessed by the reader (a diabetologist) of the retinal photos was compared with results of examinations of the patients by retinal specialists.
These ophthalmologists used direct and indirect ophthalmoscopy as well as slitlamp biomicroscopy.
Sensitivity and specificity values for photo interpretation were based on 189 patients who had gradable photos for both eyes and a retinal examination report available.
Comparison of any retinopathy noted by the examination with any retinopathy noted by the reader yielded a sensitivity and specificity of 85 percent and 93 percent, respectively.
The reader occasionally missed background retinopathy not requiring treatment.
If serious retinopathy was seen on the examination, the reader always noted some retinopathy (sensitivity: 100 percent; specificity: 82 percent).
Results show that the nonmydriatic retinal camera, which is easy to use and inexpensive, can be employed as a screening tool for detecting serious retinopathy.
The camera might identify more patients at risk for serious retinopathy than routine referral for ophthalmologic screening, for which compliance rates are often poor (74 percent in this study).
1 table, 11 references.
68 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Alternative Methods for Retinopathy Screening.
Lairson, D.R.; Pugh, J.A.; Kapadia, A.S.; Lorimor, R.J.; Jacobson, J.; Velez, R. Diabetes Care.
15(10): 1369-1377.
October 1992.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the cost-effectiveness of four approaches to screening for retinopathy.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Screening with retinal photographs in a primary care setting can be cost effective.
Cost per true-positive case was lowest for retinal photography with dilation.
RECOMMENDATION: Screening could be offered as an addition to a routine visit in a primary care clinic or on a separate visit.
ABSTRACT: The four methods of screening for retinopathy compared were (1) 45-degree retinal camera photography taken by a physician assistant or nurse practitioner without pupil dilation (n = 351), (2) the same kind of photography with pupil dilation (n = 351), (3) direct and indirect funduscopic examination (dilated pupils) by an ophthalmologist (n = 347), and (4) direct ophthalmoscopic examination (dilated pupils) by a physician assistant or nurse practitioner (n = 172).
All photographs (methods [1] and [2]
Positive retinopathy was considered a level of 40 or greater on the modified Airlie House reference standard.
Screening costs were incurred through Veterans Administration and Department of Defense facilities and included staff salaries and fringe benefits; equipment (amortized over expected life); supplies; participants' travel, screening time, and transportation; space; overhead; and reading fees.
Interest rates were set at 8.24 percent, based on 1989 long-term government bond rates, and overhead costs were set at 29.7 percent of ambulatory care health system costs.
Patient travel costs were assessed through an interview; wages for unemployed patients were calculated at $3.35 per hour.
Costeffectiveness was based on the cost per true-positive test.
Sensitivity of methods 1-4, respectively, was 0.61, 0.81, 0.33, and 0.10; specificity was 0.85, 0.96, 0.99, and 0.99.
Total cost (health system plus patient) per exam was $70, $74, $48, and $31, respectively.
The average cost to the health care system only per case of identified retinopathy was $295 (method 2); $378 (method 1); $390 (method 3); and $794 (method 4).
Adding the patient costs did not change these rankings.
1 figure, 4 tables, 22 references.
69 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Alternative Methods for Retinopathy Screening.
Wareham, N.J.
Diabetes Care.
16(5): 844.
May 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To point out an issue not raised in an article by Lairson et al. on screening methods for retinopathy (Diabetes Care.
15:1369-1377.
1992.
Abstract 53) and offer calculations of sensitivity, specificity, and cost per true-positive for the data presented by those authors.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The conclusions of cost-effectiveness drawn by Lairson et al. may not be as strong as presented.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The author notes that Lairson et al. did not account for error in their sensitivity estimates of the four screening tests they compared.
He reassesses their data by applying 95 percent confidence intervals to the sensitivity and specificity of screening patients with diabetes for retinopathy by (1) 45-degree retinal photographs without pupil dilation, (2) retinal photography with pupil dilation, (3) ophthalmologist examination, or (4) technician examination.
The sensitivity (with upper and lower 95 percent confidence limits) for 1-4 was 0.61 (0.72, 0.50), 0.81 (0.90, 0.72), 0.33 (0.44, 0.22), and 0.07 (0.14, 0), respectively.
The specificity for 1-4 was 0.85 (0.89, 0.81), 0.96 (0.99, 0.94), 1.00 (1.00, 0.99), and 0.99 (1.00, 0.97), respectively.
System cost per true-positive diagnosis with these approaches (with upper and lower estimates) was $378 ($463, $330), $295 ($331, $265), $390 ($581, $294), and $794 (not given, $379), respectively.
Patient cost per true-positive diagnosis was $171 ($209, $144), $139 ($156, $125), $306 ($454, $230), and $1,009 (not given, $481), respectively.
Because of the overlap in confidence intervals, the author points out that conclusions in this paper about the cost-effectiveness of these screening methods are weakened.
He also points out that sensitivity is a major determinant of the cost-effectiveness of screening for retinopathy and states that including confidence intervals in the estimate of the cost per true-positive case is critical for making policy decisions.
2 tables, 2 references.
70 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Current Approaches to the Control of Retinopathy in Type I Diabetics.
Javitt, J.C.; Canner, J.K.; Sommer, A. Ophthalmology.
96(2): 255-264.
February 1989.
OBJECTIVE: To estimate the benefits (in terms of preservation of vision) and attendant costs of screening, diagnosis, follow-up, and treatment of retinopathy in patients with type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Screening, diagnosis, follow-up, and treatment of retinopathy in patients with type 1 diabetes resulted in a cost of $966 per person-year of sight saved, which is only 14 percent of the direct cost to the federal government of a year of blindness-related disability.
RECOMMENDATION: The federal government should fund eye care for patients with type 1 diabetes to avoid the higher cost of disability from blindness.
ABSTRACT: The authors used a computer model to analyze the benefits (in terms of preservation of vision) and attendant costs of screening, diagnosis, follow-up, and treatment of retinopathy in patients with juvenile-onset type 1 diabetes.
Screening recommendations were taken from the Public Health Committee of the American Academy of Ophthalmology.
Current charges for screening and treatment of retinopathy were compared with current federal budgetary expenses for blindness-induced disability under the Social Security Disability program.
Incidence, disease progression, and mortality data were drawn from several population-based studies.
The computer model, based on a Monte Carlo simulation, was run for a hypothetical cohort of 31,000 patients with type 1 diabetes beginning at age 12.5 years and followed over a 60-year period.
Model inputs were based on published reports of crosssectional and disease incidence studies, clinical trials, and U.S. statistics.
The model predicted that by age 60, background retinopathy would have developed in 98 percent of the cohort, macular edema in 42 percent, and proliferative retinopathy in 72 percent.
Despite appropriate screening and treatment, ultimately 28 percent of the cohort, according to the model, would suffer severe vision loss.
Over the 60 years, costs for ophthalmologic examinations, focal laser treatment, and panretinal photocoagulation were $91.0 million, $26.0 million, and $44.0 million, respectively.
A total of 92,700 person-years of sight could be saved at the end of 60 years by the application of screening and panretinal photocoagulation.
The cost of screening and panretinal photocoagulation per person-year of sight saved was $966, which is only 14 percent of the direct cost ($6,900) to the federal government of a year of blindness-related disability payments.
8 figures, 2 tables, 35 references.
71 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Detecting and Treating Retinopathy.
Javitt, J.C.; Aiello, L.P.
Annals of Internal Medicine.
124 (1 Part 2): 164-169.
January 1, 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To determine from the perspective of health insurers the cost-effectiveness of ophthalmologic screening and treatment to prevent vision loss for patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-utility analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Ophthalmologic screening and treatment of eye disease in patients with diabetes is a highly cost-effective approach to preventing blindness in people with diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: Implementation of current guidelines regarding eye examinations for people with diabetes should be encouraged.
ABSTRACT: Detection and treatment of diabetic eye disease has been shown to result in cost savings.
Prevention of diabetes-related blindness, on a cost-effectiveness basis, ranks above other medical interventions commonly provided.
The PROPHET system, based on Monte Carlo simulation, was used to model the progression of proliferative retinopathy.
Monte Carlo simulation, which uses random number generation, allows for a simple, probability-based solution of complex disease progression processes over time.
Screening and treatment costs were derived from average Medicare charges in 1990, using a discount rate of 5 percent.
Previous reports suggest that over 413,200 person-years of sight are currently saved, and over 710,800 person-years of sight could be saved, if all patients with diabetes had appropriate ophthalmologic screening and treatment.
The cost of implementing currently recommended guidelines for screening and treatment of retinopathy was calculated to be $1,757 per person-year of sight saved.
The cost per quality-adjusted life-year (QALY) associated with detecting and treating diabetic eye disease was found to range from $1,996 per QALY for those with type 1 diabetes to $3,530 per QALY for those with type 2 diabetes who do not require insulin.
Overall cost of detecting and treating disease in patients with diabetes was $3,190 per QALY.
Despite the high level of efficacy, clinical effectiveness, and cost-effectiveness, screening and treatment for diabetic eye disease are not universally practiced.
Recommendations for annual dilated eye examinations of patients with diabetes have now been included in the Health Plan Employer Data and Information Set (HEDIS II) quality guidelines adopted throughout the managed care industry.
1 figure, 4 tables, 55 references.
72 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Strategies for Detecting Retinopathy.
Dasbach, E.J.; Fryback, D.G.; Newcomb, P.A.; Klein, R.; Klein, B.E. Medical Care.
29(1): 20-39.
January 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the cost-effectiveness of six different strategies for providing ophthalmologic care to patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Screening for retinopathy is generally cost effective in younger-onset patients and in those older-onset patients who take insulin.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors used data from the Wisconsin Epidemiologic Study of Retinopathy to create simulation models of the natural progression of retinopathy and the effects of detecting and treating retinopathy on this process.
Data were modeled (by the Markov process) for three groups of 1,000 patients: younger-onset patients (under age 30 years at diagnosis) with diabetes for 5 years or more, older-onset patients (age 30 years or over at diagnosis) who required insulin, and older-onset patients who did not take insulin.
The six strategies modeled for ophthalmologic care were annual or biannual use of ophthalmoscopy, annual or biannual use of fundus photography through physiologic pupil dilation (the nonmydriatic camera), and annual or biannual use of fundus photography through pharmacologic pupil dilation (mydriatic).
Effectiveness was based on sight years saved with intervention.
Each strategy was modeled over 10 and 60 years, with costs remaining constant; savings in years and costs were discounted by 5 percent to represent their present value.
Except for the older-onset group not taking insulin, net savings for annual or biannual screening by all methods were substantial; for 10 years they ranged from $877,656 to $997,462 in the younger-onset cohort and from $19,043 to $71,986 in the older-onset group taking insulin.
The younger-onset group (10-year model) saved more than 200 sight years by any of the strategies; the older-onset groups taking insulin saved 45 to 59 years; and those not taking insulin, 14 to 19 years.
Sixty-year results were similar to those for 10 years; an exception was that the younger-onset cohort gained considerably more sight years and cost savings.
Annual screening with fundus photography using the mydriatic camera was the most effective of the six screening strategies; however, the gain in effectiveness was small compared with annual screening with the nonmydriatic camera or with an ophthalmoscope.
7 figures, 5 tables, 32 references.
73 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of the Screening and Treatment of Retinopathy.
What Are the Costs of Underutilization? Fendrick, A.M.; Javitt, J.C.; Chiang, Y.P. International Journal of Technology Assessment in Health Care.
8(4): 694-707.
Fall 1992.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether screening and treating retinopathy is cost effective in Sweden.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Annual photographic screening to detect early signs of retinal disease combined with laser photocoagulation treatment of macular edema and retinopathy leads to improved health outcomes in terms of years of sight saved and also to decreased medical expenditures.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: A computer model (PROPHET) was used to simulate the health and economic outcomes of an annual screening program for retinal disease in a group of patients with type 1 diabetes in Sweden.
Many Swedish patients with type 1 diabetes do not receive optimal eye care because physicians have inconsistent practice patterns, are inexperienced in performing the eye exam, and lack knowledge of screening recommendations.
Screening for retinopathy and macular edema before high-risk lesions become worse is the key to preventing vision loss.
The study looked at 750 patients newly diagnosed with diabetes over a 60-year life span.
Fundus photography (3 fields per eye) was used as the screening method and photocoagulation (panretinal for proliferative retinopathy and focal retinal for macular edema) was employed to treat eye disease.
The model predicted that background retinopathy, a preclinical state, would be present in 98 percent of the patients after 60 years of diabetes.
Macular edema and proliferative retinopathy were predicted to occur in more than 50 percent of the patients in that period.
The number of person-years of vision preserved by annual screening was closely linked to patient compliance with screening recommendations.
The model revealed that with a compliance rate of 70 percent, more than 45,000 screening exams were performed over the 60-year study period and 2,306 years of vision were saved.
Without screening and treatment, 6,500 years of sight would be lost.
The model showed that with a screening compliance rate of 60 to 100 percent, net savings, including the costs of screening and treatment, would range from $3.7 to $6 million (U.S. dollars).
Although the program was costly in the beginning, its net cost decreased over time as the years of sight saved accrued and treatment sessions decreased.
Sensitivity analysis was performed to evaluate variables for which there was uncertainty.
In this model, screening compliance rates correlated positively with improved clinical and economic outcomes.
5 figures, 3 tables, 64 references.
74 TITLE: Detecting and Treating Retinopathy in Patients with Type I Diabetes Mellitus: A Health Policy Model.
Javitt, J.C.; Canner, J.K.; Frank, R.G.; Steinwachs, D.M.; Sommer, A. Ophthalmology.
97(4): 483-494 (discussion: 494-495).
April 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To estimate the medical and economic implications to the federal government of several screening and treatment strategies for retinopathy in patients with type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: All five retinopathy screening and treatment strategies resulted in cost savings to the federal government.
RECOMMENDATION: Public health policy must consider the enormous medical and economic benefits that can be realized by detecting and treating diabetic eye disease.
ABSTRACT: The authors used a cost-benefit model to evaluate the average net savings to the federal government of retinopathy screening and treatment in patients with type 1 diabetes.
Using a PROPHET simulation system, the authors analyzed outcomes for a hypothetical cohort of 31,000 patients developing the disease at age 12.5 years; these values represent annual incidence and average age of onset for this disorder in the United States.
Five screening strategies involving various schedules of dilated ophthalmoscopy with and without full fundus photographs were tested: (1) ophthalmoscopy (with the eyes dilated) every 2 years, (2) annual ophthalmoscopic exam, (3) ophthalmoscopic exam annually for patients with no retinopathy, every 6 months for those with retinopathy, (4) annual ophthalmoscopic exam with full fundus photography, and (5) annual ophthalmoscopic exam with fundus photographs for patients with no retinopathy, an exam and photos every 6 months for those with retinopathy.
The discount rate was set at 5 percent; potential savings (in 1986 dollars) were based on the amounts paid by the federal government for blindness-related disability ($6,300 annually in the model).
Undiscounted screening and treatment costs for the five strategies varied from $89.2 million to $290.3 million.
All of the strategies resulted in substantial net annual savings to the federal government, ranging from $62.1 million to $108.6 million.
The model predicted a clear medical and economic advantage for the strategy of dilated ophthalmoscopy performed annually, then semiannually upon diagnosis of retinopathy.
This strategy had the second highest government savings (annual ophthalmoscopy only had the highest), but saved several thousand more person-years of sight than annual ophthalmoscopy.
Positive returns were seen for all five strategies at discount rates below 10 percent.
Screening and treatment were cost-saving if the value of a year of sight saved was $2,500 or more.
Little advantage was demonstrated in adding routine fundus photography to screening exams.
3 figures, 8 tables, 41 references.
75 TITLE: Detecting and Treating Retinopathy in Patients with Type I Diabetes Mellitus: Savings Associated with Improved Implementation of Current Guidelines.
Javitt, J.C.; Aiello, L.P.; Bassi, L.J.; Chiang, Y.P.; Canner, J.K. Ophthalmology.
98(10): 1565-1573 (discussion: 1574).
October 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To estimate the net federal budgetary savings that might be attained with increased enrollment of patients with type 1 diabetes into appropriate ophthalmologic care.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: At current levels of screening and treatment implementation, it is less expensive to provide preventive eye care for patients with type 1 diabetes than to support subsequent disability.
Because each 10 percent improvement in implementation over current levels would save $16.5 million annually, significant recruitment efforts could be undertaken without diminishing returns.
RECOMMENDATION: Public education should be expanded so that all possible patients are recruited into appropriate screening strategies, and primary care physicians must be enlisted to identify patients so that strict ophthalmologic follow-up may be instituted.
ABSTRACT: The authors analyzed the net federal budgetary savings achieved under current American Academy of Ophthalmology screening and treatment conditions for retinopathy in patients with type 1 diabetes and estimated savings that might be obtained by increased enrollment of patients into appropriate ophthalmologic care.
A PROPHET modeling system, based on Monte Carlo techniques, was used to analyze events and costs.
Disease data in the model were derived primarily from reports of cross-sectional studies and clinical trials.
Screening and treatment costs were derived from average Medicare charges in 1990.
The authors expressed costs and savings in 1990 U.S. dollars with a discount rate of 5 percent.
They estimated that 60 percent of patients with type 1 diabetes receive retinopathy treatment and screening that meets American Academy of Ophthalmology guidelines.
At this level, 47,374 person-years of sight are salvaged and $101.0 million saved annually.
The model predicts that for every additional 10 percent of patients who enter screening, more than 7,966 person-years of sight and $16.5 million in further annual savings would be realized.
With 100 percent screening, 79,236 person-years of sight and $167.0 million would be saved annually.
Current American Academy of Ophthalmology guidelines recommend initiating retinopathy screening 5 years after diagnosis of type 1 diabetes.
The additional annual financial burden of beginning screening upon diagnosis would be $3.03 million.
However, the yearly increase in expense would be recovered totally if less than 1 additional patient were recruited to screening from every 56 patients with diabetes.
The model predicts a loss of $17.4 million and 5,961 person-years of sight if treatment of retinopathy is delayed 1 year.
8 figures, 3 tables, 41 references.
76 TITLE: Detection of Sight-Threatening Diabetic Eye Disease.
Leese, G.P.; Broadbent, D.M.; Harding, S.P.; Vora, J.P. Diabetic Medicine.
13(10): 850-853.
October 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To review the feasibility and costs of screening methods to detect asymptomatic eye disease in patients with diabetes in the United Kingdom.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Community-based screening programs employing fundus photography or slit-lamp biomicroscopy may offer a cost-effective alternative to ophthalmological screening for eye diseases in patients with diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: Formal research-based measurements of the effectiveness of alternative eye disease screening methods are needed, and health services purchasers must be persuaded to implement cost-effective community-based screening programs.
ABSTRACT: The authors review the status of screening for sight-threatening eye disease among patients with diabetes in the United Kingdom and assess the feasibility of alternatives to ophthalmological examinations.
Because the number of ophthalmologists in the United Kingdom is not sufficient to allow screening of all patients, other options must be considered.
Screening for retinopathy and other eye diseases at hospital-based clinics, at general practice clinics, in optometry practices, and by mobile fundus photography is discussed.
The perpatient cost of screening by direct ophthalmoscopy has been estimated at £ 13 when performed by community-based optometrists, £ 15 by general practitioners, and £ 27 by hospital physicians.
Costs of fundus photography by a mobile unit have been estimated at between £ 10 and £ 23 per patient versus £ 19 per screen if the camera is maintained within a hospital.
When using a mobile van, overall costs per potentially sight-saving treatment have been estimated by other researchers at £ 700 to £ 1,000.
Screening by fundus photography has been demonstrated to be more cost effective than ophthalmoscopy because of its greater sensitivity.
Screening costs must be evaluated in comparison with the costs of supporting a blind person in the community, which were estimated in 1981 to be £ 3,500 per year.
42 references.
77 TITLE: Evaluation of Argon Laser Treatment of Retinopathy and Its Diffusion in The Netherlands.
Vondeling, H. Health Policy.
23(12): 97111.
January 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To review studies on argon laser treatment for retinopathy, including its costeffectiveness; to discuss the diffusion of this technology.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Screening for and treating retinopathy is cost effective.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: Clinical trial evidence indicates that immediate argon laser treatment can prevent blindness and stabilize retinopathy for at least 10 years in 70 percent of cases.
Drummond et al. (1990) analyzed the U.S. Retinopathy Study and found a net savings from the trial for U.S. society over 22 years of laser photocoagulation of $2,816 million (including $2,585 million in lost production).
Another model (Javitt and coworkers), for patients with type 1 diabetes, predicted a cost (in 1986 dollars) of $966 per person-year of vision saved from proliferative retinopathy and $1,118 per person-year of central acuity saved from macular edema; in contrast, average annual federal payments to eligible blind recipients were $6,900.
A model of screening practices indicated that the most cost-effective method is dilated ophthalmoscopy performed annually for patients without retinopathy and every 6 months for those with retinopathy.
Proper screening of 60 percent of persons with type 1 diabetes would result in annual savings of 47,374 person-years of sight and $101 million.
In The Netherlands, the number of argon lasers increased from 10 prior to 1978 to 111 in 1992.
Change in clinical practice in The Netherlands could have been implemented more quickly with more active governmental support.
Adequate screening for diabetic eye disease is being promoted by the American Academy of Ophthalmology, the U.S. National Eye Institute, the World Health Organization, and the International Diabetes Federation.
Further studies are needed to document accurately the cost-effectiveness of screening and early treatment programs.
3 figures, 21 references.
78 TITLE: The Evaluation of Mobile Screening for Retinopathy.
Thompson, C.; Leese, G. Scottish Medical Journal.
40(1): 5-7.
February 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To overview the use of mobile screening for retinopathy.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Mobile retinal cameras, which offer the chance to expand eye screening for retinopathy, particularly to remote and rural areas, should be considered a valuable addition to current methods.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors review previous studies on screening for retinopathy in the United Kingdom.
The ideal screening program for retinopathy, which has yet to be determined, should be technically accurate, cost effective, and applicable to the whole population.
Mobile screening in the community is a possible alternative for patients who do not attend diabetes clinics and may be particularly valuable in remote rural areas, where fewer people attend specialty diabetes clinics or receive a regular ophthalmic examination.
In the great majority of cases, mydriatic drops (to increase pupil size) are not required for the retinal cameras used.
An evaluation of a rural mobile screening program (in Tayside) for persons with diabetes found that 20 percent of those not attending diabetic clinics had retinopathy, and 6.5 percent needed urgent ophthalmological assessment.
It has been estimated that a comprehensive screening program that included detection, referral, treatment, and follow-up would reduce new blindness by 10 percent in persons under 70 years.
A recent multicenter study on screening found the cost of diagnosis per true-positive case of sight-threatening retinopathy to be 33 to £ 1,079 when the screener was a general practitioner, £ 497 for a mobile communitybased retinal camera, £ 1,546 for a hospital-based retinal camera, £ 1,028 for opticians, and £ 1,033 for hospital physicians.
In the Tayside program, the cost to screen a patient was £ 10; the cost per case of newly discovered sight-threatening retinopathy was £ 50.
The cost per patient receiving laser therapy for retinopathy was £ 1,000.
A screening service's costeffectiveness depends on the prior probability of detecting significant retinopathy; after the initial impact of the mobile camera it may drop because of the low annual incidence of this problem.
The development of a strategy for identifying high-risk groups has been advocated.
24 references.
79 TITLE: Local Survey of Optometrists about Dilated Funduscopic Examinations for Patients with Diabetes: Making Use of Phone Book Yellow-Page Listings.
Foster, D.T.; Wylie-Rosett, J.; Walker, E.A. Diabetes Educator.
22(6): 605-608.
November-December 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the knowledge, attitudes, and practices of optometrists in the Bronx, New York, area related to providing dilated funduscopic examination for patients with diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Telephone survey.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Dilated funduscopic examinations were available at a relatively modest cost in over half of the optometry practices listed in the NYNEX yellow pages for the Bronx.
RECOMMENDATION: Information is needed concerning how to increase education about dilated fundoscopic examinations in medically underserved areas such as the South Bronx.
Campaigns to increase the rate of dilated funduscopy among patients with diabetes should consider how optometrists interact with the medical care system to achieve early detection of retinopathy and other diabetes-related eye problems.
ABSTRACT: The authors surveyed optometrists listed in the Bronx, New York, NYNEX yellow pages.
Telephone interviews were conducted with 23 of the 31 optometry practices listed.
Dilated funduscopic examinations were performed by 13 of the 23 practices.
The primary contraindication to performing dilated funduscopy cited by respondents who performed the examination was narrow-angle glaucoma; hypertension was also mentioned as a contraindication (it is not considered one per se, and this problem is frequently associated with diabetes).
Estimates by optometrists of the percentage of patients with diabetes who knew of the need for dilated funduscopy examinations ranged from 2 percent in the South Bronx to 25 percent for Westchester County (New York) practices.
Billing charges for a general examination ranged from $12 to $55.
The billing charge for dilated funduscopy ranged from no additional charge to a $27 extra charge.
Of the 23 practices, Medicaid payment for examinations was accepted by 22, credit card by 20, and Medicare by 18.
Performing dilated funduscopy could be a recruitment strategy for optometrists and might increase the number of patients who get this examination annually.
2 tables, 12 references.
80 TITLE: Meeting the Challenge of Diabetic Blindness in the 90's.
Yeo, K.; Fan, R.; Yong, V. Singapore Medical Journal.
34(2): 128-130.
April 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To describe a 5-year screening and education program for diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Blindness from retinopathy is largely preventable.
RECOMMENDATION: Institute a nationwide program of screening and treatment for diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The prevalence of diabetes in Singapore is rising, and retinopathy is a leading cause of blindness among Singapore adults.
Hospital-based screening efforts in Singapore will reach only a small percentages of those with diabetes.
Most Singapore patients with diabetes are treated in primary-level services (general practitioners, outpatient departments), where direct ophthalmoscopy is widely available.
This approach, however, has important technical limitations.
Many persons with diabetes do not know that diabetes might cause blindness, and those with good vision are often not motivated to seek a fundal examination.
If blindness can be prevented in 10 percent of the people in Singapore who have diabetes, cost savings will be significant.
A nationwide screening program for public education in diabetes; training of medical staff, nursing personnel, and volunteers; and providing adequate treatment and follow-up facilities are suggested to reduce blindness from diabetes, with initial screening targeting high-risk groups.
As a first step, the authors suggest establishing a centralized screening clinic in a hospital or diabetic center coupled with a mobile screening service.
They project that 16,800 patients can be screened the first year, with 10 percent increments each year, for a total of 102,564 patients for 5 years.
The cost of these two programs is estimated at $150,000 (Singapore dollars) for the first year, with equipment accounting for the major expenditure in that year.
The cost of screening is not excessive and is much below the cost of treating late-stage retinopathy and rehabilitating blind patients.
The loss of economically productive persons with diabetes must also be considered.
Education can be carried out through mobile exhibits, mass media, talks and seminars, and a diabetes education exhibit in the screening center.
Additional laser facilities would have to be made available to treat patients with sight-threatening retinopathy.
8 references.
81 TITLE: Mobile Retinal Photography: A Means of Screening for Retinopathy in Aboriginal Communities.
Karagiannis, A.; Newland, H. Australian and New Zealand Journal of Ophthalmology.
24(4):333-337.
November 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To determine whether interpretable fundus photographs of the eye could be taken by specially trained aboriginal health workers in a mobile screening setting.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Quality review.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Of the 390 photographs taken of 47 patients known to have diabetes, 371 slides were of sufficient clarity to interpret for retinopathy.
However, 158 of the 371 slides were suboptimal.
RECOMMENDATION: Mobile retinal photography carried out by aboriginal health workers as part of routine health visits could be an efficient, practical approach to eye screening of aboriginal diabetes patients living in remote areas and of monitoring patients with existing retinopathy.
ABSTRACT: The prevalence of diabetes in the aboriginal community in Australia is estimated to be up to 15 percent.
Aborigines and Torres Strait Islanders living in remote areas of Australia and New Zealand have limited access to screening services for retinopathy.
The investigators describe a pilot study to train aboriginal health workers to take fundus photographs of the eyes of aborigines with diabetes during routine health clinic visits.
The health workers received 2 weeks of training from an ophthalmic photographer; 1 week took place on-site in an aboriginal community.
The photographer then supervised the health workers on 2 clinic visits in a 6-month period in the community during which the health workers carried out dilated eye examinations in 47 known diabetes patients.
The health workers took an average of 8 photographs per patient (range: 4 to 27), for a total of 390 slides.
A retinal specialist compared the slides with baseline photographs taken by the ophthalmic photographer at the beginning of each clinic visit and graded them for quality and interpretability.
Nineteen slides, representing 11 patients, could not be read; 371 slides were of sufficient quality to detect significant eye disease.
The unit cost per photograph was $1.00 (Australian dollars), not including the cost of the equipment, services of the retinal specialist, or mobile screening vehicle.
2 figures, 14 references.
82 TITLE: Ophthalmic Screening for Diabetics: The Importance of Physician-Ophthalmologist Collaboration in the Prevention of Blindness.
Chew, S.J.; Hart, P.M.; Ang, B.C.; Lim, A. Singapore Medical Journal.
31(1): 26-29.
February 1990.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the efficacy and cost-effectiveness of a screening program for retinopathy involving the coordination of primary physician and ophthalmologist services.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The screening program accurately identified patients with varying degrees of retinopathy at a reasonable cost.
RECOMMENDATION: Screening for retinopathy based on fundus photography performed by primary care physicians and interpreted by ophthalmologists should be considered an accurate, cost-effective strategy for blindness prevention in patients with diabetes.
ABSTRACT: The screening program, which was offered in Singapore, included Polaroid fundus photography, noncontact tonometry, and blood pressure measurement, with primary care physicians and ophthalmologists equally responsible for patient care.
Screening examinations took place at a retinal clinic, and photographs were reviewed and discussed with patients by a retinal specialist.
During the first 6 months of the program, 428 patients with known diabetes were screened; retinopathy was detected in 161 eyes (18.8 percent).
The prevalence of retinopathy was closely associated with duration of diabetes; age of onset was of lesser importance.
Of the 161 eyes with retinopathy, 60 percent exhibited only background changes; sight-threatening retinopathy was found in 7.6 percent of all cases (59 of 856 eyes).
Background retinopathy occurred in 22.5 percent of eyes among patients with type 1 diabetes and 9.7 percent of eyes among patients with type 2 diabetes.
Proliferative retinopathy was 10 times more prevalent in the eyes of patients with type 1 than in the eyes of patients with type 2 diabetes.
Patients were charged S$6.00 for the screening service, which included the cost of photography.
7 tables, 5 references.
83 TITLE: Opportunities for Cost Reduction in Retinopathy Treatment: Case Study From Mexico.
Phillips, M.; del Rio, I.; Quiroz, H. Bulletin of the Pan American Health Organization.
28(1): 50-61.
March 1994.
OBJECTIVE: To measure the costs of treating eye problems in patients with diabetes, to find out who bears these costs, and to determine how cost reduction could be accomplished.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: The cost of treating eye problems was quite high, and the individual patient bore most of the costs for treatment.
Reducing the number of visits could substantially lower the economic impact on patients.
RECOMMENDATION: Further research is needed to clarify the benefits gained by patients who have photocoagulation laser therapy.
ABSTRACT: A randomized study was conducted at the Hospital for the Prevention of Blindness in Mexico City to determine the costs of treating patients with diabetes who had retinopathy.
Clinical records of a random sample of 69 patients were used to collect data on demographic and socioeconomic variables, diabetes treatment, initial eye diagnosis, and the amount and type of eye treatment provided by the hospital from 1985 to 1991.
The cost of the resources used for each type of treatment provided was determined.
Patient interviews provided information about treatment-associated costs incurred by patients and those accompanying them.
The average age of patients was 59 years; most were poor and had little formal education.
All lacked private health insurance and none was reimbursed for medical care expenses incurred.
The cost of treatment per patient over 5 years was $630; the patient and family paid 83 percent of the cost.
Fees accounted for 45 percent of patient costs, other direct expenses (e.g., travel and accommodations) made up another 45 percent, and lost income accounted for 10 percent.
Suggestions for reducing patient costs without lowering quality of care included shortening waiting time, increasing the strength of laser treatments to decrease number of visits needed, completing more procedures in a single visit, revising the policy on fluoroangiography, and educating patients and at-risk relatives accompanying them about the need for early detection and treatment of eye problems.
5 tables, 13 references.
84 TITLE: Practical Community Screening for Retinopathy Using the Mobile Retinal Camera: Report of a 12 Centre Study.
British Diabetic Association Mobile Retinal Screening Group.
Also, Population-based Screening for Retinopathy: A Promising Start (Comment).
Greenwood, R.H. Diabetic Medicine.
13(11):925-926, 946-952.
November 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To report the progress of a project involving the use of mobile units equipped with retinal cameras to provide eye screening services to diabetes patients in 12 health districts in the United Kingdom.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Statistical analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The mobile units performed 64,905 screenings; analysis of 42,803 screenings found 2,400 referrals for further evaluation, of which 516 resulted in immediate laser therapy for sight-threatening disease.
During subsequent years of this multiyear project, the number of patients referred and those needing laser therapy declined.
RECOMMENDATION: Mobile eye screening programs should be designed to fit the specific needs of each district, retinal photographers should be personable and well trained, and close liaisons with local ophthalmologists should be established.
ABSTRACT: In 1989, the British Diabetic Association initiated a mobile eye screening program designed to reduce morbidity from diabetic eye disease, the leading cause of blindness in working-age adults.
Twelve health centers, representing urban and rural areas, participated in the program.
The vans were equipped with retinal cameras, and each center was responsible for training an operator/driver, determining how the screening service would be used in the district, and setting up systems for reporting results.
Most screenings (76.5 percent) were carried out in primary care settings; the remainder were carried out in hospitalbased settings.
The average cost per patient screened and per patient treated was £ 13.11 and £ 1,110, respectively.
Patient acceptance of the screening process was high, and in 10 of 12 districts financial responsibility for the program has been taken over by hospital trusts or district health authorities.
The investigators conclude that the use of mobile vans for retinal screening is cost effective and efficient.
An accompanying "Comment" notes that performance standards need to be developed by a central organization such as the British Diabetic Association before the program can be implemented on a wider scale.
A table of proposed standards developed by the British Diabetic Association Retinal Screening Group is presented in the original article.
The article also includes an appendix listing reports from district units.
7 tables, 1 appendix, 19 references in principal article; 15 references in Comment.
85 TITLE: Preventive Eye Care in People with Diabetes Is Cost-Saving to the Federal Government: Implications for Health Care Reform.
Javitt, J.C.; Aiello, L.P.; Chiang, Y.; Ferris, F.L.; Canner, J.K. III; Greenfield, S. Diabetes Care.
17(8): 909-917.
August 1994.
OBJECTIVE: To estimate savings to the federal government from screening and treatment of retinopathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Improvement in ophthalmologic screening of patients with type 2 diabetes will reduce vision loss and save money for the federal government.
RECOMMENDATION: Eye care for patients with type 2 diabetes must emphasize patient identification, careful follow-up, and prompt, appropriate treatment.
ABSTRACT: The authors used the PROPHET computer model system to project the incidence and the costs of screening and treatment of eye disease resulting from diabetes.
PROPHET is designed to model the course of a chronic, irreversible disease.
Incidence data for type 2 diabetes were applied to 1990 Medicare, Social Security Disability Insurance, and Social Security Insurance costs for screening and treatment; a 5 percent discount rate was used.
Costs of screening were based on complete dilated eye examinations ($62 each) at diagnosis and every 2, 3, or 4 years or, for those with retinopathy, every 6, 12, 18, or 24 months.
Treatment (photocoagulation for both eyes) cost, including fluorescein angiograms, was $1,980.
Based on 1988 population figures for the United States, 576,136 patients yearly develop type 2 diabetes.
Blindness in patients with diabetes costs the federal government $14,296 annually per patient under age 65; per patient aged 65 and over, federal expenditures are $32 annually (does not include Medicare/Social Security payments or income tax exemption).
Screening and treatment for eye disease in patients with type 2 diabetes saves 53,986 person-years of sight at an annual federal budget savings of $247.9 million; these results assume that 60 percent of type 2 patients receive appropriate eye care.
For patients with type 2 diabetes controlled by insulin, however, savings would be $1,715 per person, versus $725 for those controlled by other means.
Patients with onset prior to age 45 account for 89.1 percent of sight savings and 100 percent of cost savings.
With recommended eye care, 112,730 and 94,304 person-years of sight and $624 and $472.1 million would be saved annually in all patients with diabetes and those with type 2 diabetes, respectively.
4 figures, 2 tables, 52 references.
86 TITLE: A Relative Cost-Effectiveness Analysis of Different Methods of Screening for Retinopathy.
Sculpher, M.J.; Buxton, M.J.; Ferguson, B.A.; Humphreys, J.E.; Altman, J.F.; Spiegelhalter, D.J.; Kirby, A.J.; Jacob, J.S.; Bacon, H.; Dudbridge, S.B.; Stead, J.W.; Feest, T.G.; Cheng, H.; Franklin, S.L.; Courtney, P.; Talbot, J.F.; Ahmed, R.; Dabbs, T.R. Diabetic Medicine.
8(7): 644650.
August/September 1991.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the relative cost effectiveness of various screening methods for sight-threatening retinopathy in terms of cost per true-positive case detected.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Cost per true-positive case ranged from £ 633 to £ 1,079 for general practitioners; it was £ 1,033 for a hospital physician; £ 784 for an ophthalmic optician; £ 441 to £ 609 for an ophthalmological clinical assistant; £ 601 to £ 1,546 for a hospital-based camera; and £ 497 to £ 747 for a traveling camera.
Except for the ophthalmological clinical assistant (the reference standard), the sensitivity of all screening methods was low (0.35 to 0.67).
Relative Cost-effectiveness changes if the screening can take place without requiring an additional patient visit and is strongly related to the relative sensitivity of the screening methods and to the prior probability (prevalence or incidence) of retinopathy in the population with diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: Approaches to screening, which are discussed in this report, may improve sensitivity without reducing specificity or increasing cost per true-positive case substantially.
ABSTRACT: The authors report on screening for sight-threatening retinopathy of five patient groups (n = 3,318) in three British centers.
Patients' fundi were assessed by a primary screener (a hospital physician, a general practitioner, or an ophthalmic optician) using ophthalmoscopy with mydriasis.
Additionally, all patients had their fundi photographed by a nonmydriatic fundus camera, and they received an ophthalmoscopic examination with mydriasis by an ophthalmological clinical assistant (the reference standard).
The costs per true-positive case for the primary screeners ranged from £ 633 to £ 1,079 ( £ 1,033 for the hospital physician), for the clinical assistant from £ 441 to £ 609, and for photography from £ 497 for a camera that is taken to general practices in one center to £ 1,546 for a hospitalbased camera.
The cost for true-positive case for hospital physicians would drop from £ 1,033 to £ 353 if an additional visit to the hospital were not required.
Similarly, if ophthalmoscopy is part of a general assessment by a general practitioner rather than requiring an additional visit, the cost per true-positive case would drop dramatically (to £ 245 to £ 362).
Total costs per patient screened by primary screeners ranged from £ 19.31 for ophthalmic opticians to £ 37.77 for hospital physicians.
The low sensitivities of primary screeners and of photography (35 to 67 percent) may indicate that none of these methods would be acceptable in routine clinical practice, despite their relatively high specificities (86 to 98 percent).
Alternatives that may improve sensitivity (while avoiding a reduction in specificity or increase in cost per truepositive case detected) include (1) clinical assistant screening of both hospital and communitybased patients; (2) use of combined screening strategies (e.g., general practitioner, ophthalmoscopy and fundus photography); and (3) identification of risk factors for retinopathy that could be used, exclusively or in combination with single or joint screening methods, as forms of screening in themselves (e.g., patients with 10+ years of type 1 diabetes could be referred directly to an ophthalmologist without prior screening).
1 figure, 3 tables, 25 references.
87 TITLE: Retinopathy in the West of Scotland: Its Detection and Prevalence, and the CostEffectiveness of a Proposed Screening Programme.
Foulds, W.S.; McCuish, A.; Barrie, T.; Green, F.; Scobie, I.N.; Ghafour, I.M.; McClure, E.; Barber, J.H. Health Bulletin.
41(6): 318326.
November 1983.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the prevalence of retinopathy as diagnosed by ophthalmoscopy in the West of Scotland and to evaluate the financial implications of implementing a screening program for retinopathy in that part of Scotland.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: A projected screening program for retinopathy appeared to be cost savings in terms of costs of patient identification and screening relative to savings associated with the prevention of blindness.
RECOMMENDATION: Universal screening for early detection of serious retinopathy should be performed.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the prevalence of retinopathy in the West of Scotland.
Based on ophthalmoscopic examination of 1,147 patients with diabetes, the authors estimated the prevalence of retinopathy to be 26 to 35 percent; of serious retinopathy, 9.5 to 11 percent.
The potential cost-effectiveness of a proposed screening program involving annual ophthalmoscopic examination of all patients with diabetes in the West of Scotland (population about 2.5 million) was assessed.
Projected annual cost associated with physician/ophthalmologist examination plus nurse time was £ 51,800.
Total annual cost to identify those patients with serious retinopathy was estimated to be £ 55,300 , or £ 183 per patient with serious retinopathy identified.
Total cost per annum of identifying and treating patients at risk for blindness was estimated to be £ 387 per patient treated.
Costs associated with identifying and treating a backlog of patients during the first year of the program were estimated to be £ 86 per patient treated.
Projected savings in blind welfare services and state benefits per case of prevented blindness were calculated to be £ 3,575.
It is estimated that 60 percent of blindness from retinopathy could be prevented by appropriate laser therapy.
Total savings to the state per annum in treating and preventing blindness in such a percentage of atrisk patients were estimated to be £ 193,050.
One-time savings associated with treating the backlog of patients with serious retinopathy were estimated to be £ 1.6 million.
Appropriate laser therapy was estimated to result in a net savings of £ 135,025 annually based on projected treatment costs and savings for the state associated with blindness prevention.
In addition, the 90 patients annually prevented from going blind would be expected to earn £ 4.67 million.
1 table, 10 references.
88 TITLE: Retinopathy -- Need and Demand for Photocoagulation and Its Cost-Effectiveness: Evaluation Based on Services in the United Kingdom.
Savolainen, E.A.; Lee, Q.P. Diabetologia.
23(2): 138-140.
August 1982.
OBJECTIVE: To assess both need for photocoagulation and the cost-effectiveness of using this therapy in patients with retinopathy.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Patient care model.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: The cost of photocoagulation and follow-up is less than the indirect costs to maintain a blind person for 1 year.
RECOMMENDATION: Criteria for the need for photocoagulation are urgently needed.
ABSTRACT: The authors used published literature from 1962 to 1978 to estimate the number of patients with diabetes needing photocoagulation for retinopathy in two regional Health Authorities in England.
They also reviewed case notes (only 141 of 272 sampled were available) from 9 of 10 photocoagulation centers in the region.
Interviews were conducted with consultants at the centers, and information on manpower, equipment, and practices with different patient groups was obtained to develop a model for estimating consultant hours and treatments needed per year.
It was estimated that 10,608 eyes were in need of photocoagulation, which would require 21,417 consultant hours per year and 14,496 treatments.
The estimated number of actual treatments for 1979 was only 3,080.
The annual outpatient cost for photocoagulation and follow-up was £ 100 per patient ( £ 170 in 1981 to 1982 prices).
The cost of maintaining one blind person for 1 year (considering lost earnings and Social Security payments) was estimated to be £ 1,751 ( £ 2,871 at the end of 1981).
As two of the nine centers in the sample accept patients from outside the regions, these data indicate that fewer than 20 percent of the patient need for photocoagulation was met.
Patients may be undiagnosed or diagnosed too late for treatment to be effective.
Criteria are needed to guide early detection, adequate treatment, and follow-up of retinopathy in patients with diabetes.
Interested physicians, and possibly paramedical staff, will require training in photocoagulation to meet the need for this service.
1 figure, 1 table, 10 references.
89 TITLE: Screening for Retinopathy in a Clinical Setting: A Comparison of Direct Ophthalmoscopy by Primary Care Physicians with Fundus Photography.
Griffith, S.P.; Freeman, W.L.; Shaw, C.J.; Mitchell, W.H.; Olden, C.R.; Figgs, L.D.; Kinyoun, J.L.; Underwood, D.L.; Will, J.C. Journal of Family Practice.
37(1): 49-56.
July 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the accuracy and cost-effectiveness of two approaches to screening for retinopathy in a clinical setting: (1) ophthalmoscopy by trained primary care physicians followed by referral to ophthalmologists as indicated, and (2) seven-view nonstereoscopic, mydriatic fundal photographs read by general ophthalmologists and retinal specialists.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Dilated ophthalmoscopic screening by primary care physicians followed by referral to an ophthalmologist if indicated was at least as accurate as and more cost effective than nonstereoscopic mydriatic fundus photographs read by ophthalmologists in screening for retinopathy.
RECOMMENDATION: Future studies should measure the absolute sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value of referral decisions for various diabetic retinal screening strategies and should estimate their costs.
Similar trials should be conducted in other clinical settings to assess physicians' referral decisions.
ABSTRACT: The two screening strategies were implemented at a rural clinic in Toppenish, Washington, that served more than 400 Native Americans with diabetes.
During the 2.5-year study period, 243 clinic visits were recorded; 93 referrals were made, of which 83 were completed.
The primary care physicians were first given a 2-hour update about retinopathy and their role as screeners; they were told to refer every patient with marked retinopathy to an ophthalmologist.
The "primary physician method" referred all 17 patients ultimately diagnosed with significant retinopathy.
Estimated maximum sensitivity in diagnosing retinopathy was 100 percent for primary physicians; for the general ophthalmologists and retinal specialists reading photographs, it was 94 and 100 percent, respectively.
Estimated maximum specificity was 93 percent for the primary physician, 82 percent for the general ophthalmologists, and 64 percent for the retinal specialists.
Projected costs, including personnel and material costs plus examination charges (according to the American Academy of Ophthalmology), for screening and diagnosing 100 patients by these methods were $3,132 for ophthalmoscopic screening by primary providers, $4,942 to $5,734 for screening by retinal photography, and $8,800 for referring all patients for full annual examination by an ophthalmologist.
Transportation, training, equipment, and other direct or indirect costs were not included.
3 tables, 34 references.
90 TITLE: Screening for Retinopathy in South Africa with 60 Retinal Colour Photography.
Joannou, J.; Kalk, W.J.; Mahomed, I.; Ntsepo, S.; Berzin, M.; Joffe, B.I.; Raal, F.J.; Sachs, E.; Van Der Merwe, M.T.; Wing, J.R. Journal of Internal Medicine.
239(1): 4347.
January 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To assess the use of a 60 mydriatic fundal camera to screen for retinopathy.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Mydriatic retinal photography with a 60 field was more sensitive and diagnostically more accurate than funduscopy by clinic doctors and compared well with screening by an ophthalmologist.
Screening for treatable retinopathy by 60 mydriatic retinal photography is likely to be cost effective.
RECOMMENDATION: Both retinae should be screened.
ABSTRACT: Patients attending a diabetes clinic in South Africa were screened for retinopathy by mydriatic fundal photography with a 60 camera.
Selected eyes were evaluated by an ophthalmologist.
Randomized photographs were assessed through single or two overlapping 45 fields (by masking the slides) and at 60.
The authors found that 92 percent to 94 percent of photographs were diagnostically useful (80 percent were excellent quality), which compares well with nonmydriatic cameras.
Compared with an ophthalmologist's assessment, retinal photography had a sensitivity of 93 percent and a specificity of 89 percent for any retinopathy, and 100 percent and 75 percent, respectively, for severe retinopathy.
Funduscopy missed 28 percent of affected eyes, compared with only 5.5 percent missed by photography.
A single 45 field missed 31 percent and two overlapping 45 fields missed 11 percent of retinopathy as compared with that detected by a 60 field camera.
For the 122 eyes assessed at the three field areas, the mean scores increased significantly as the field area increased (p 
The costs of screening were calculated from the price of film and processing (but not the camera) and from related staff salaries for the first 663 patients screened.
The basic expenditure (in U.S. dollars) was determined to be $5.85 per patient screened, $13.55 per patient with retinopathy (n = 286), and $37.03 for each patient referred for formal ophthalmological assessment (n = 103, 15.5 percent).
2 figures, 1 table, 30 references.
91 TITLE: Use of Mobile Screening Unit for Retinopathy in Rural and Urban Areas.
Leese, G.P.; Ahmed, S.; Newton, R.W.; Jung, R.T.; Ellingford, A.; Baines, P.; Roxburgh, S.; Coleiro, J. British Medical Journal.
306(6871): 187-189.
January 16, 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the rate of retinopathy detected by a mobile screening unit equipped with a nonmydriatic Polaroid between rural and urban areas; to identify the cost associated with the service.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient screening.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Mobile eye-screening units seem to be particularly effective at identifying previously unrecognized advanced retinopathy in rural patients with diabetes; these patients were more likely than urban patients to need urgent laser photocoagulation.
The cost per patient with mobile eye screening units was relatively low.
RECOMMENDATION: Patients with diabetes living in rural areas are less likely to seek help at hospital clinics and would benefit from an expanded mobile-eye-screening program to detect and treat retinopathy.
ABSTRACT: Researchers compared the effective-ness of screening for retinopathy using mobile eye-screening units in rural versus urban patients with diabetes during 2 years in the Tayside region of Scotland.
They estimated that 64 to 77 percent of the population with diabetes was screened: 1,225 urban and 961 rural patients were photographed with a nonmydriatic fundal camera.
Rural patients were less likely to attend a hospital clinic than urban patients (46 percent versus 86 percent, p 
Advanced retinopathy was greater among rural than urban patients (13 percent versus 7 percent, p 
Direct and indirect costs, estimated for screening 1,800 patients a year, included the salary of the ophthalmic photographer; the purchasing and processing of film; and the servicing, running, and depreciation costs of the van and camera.
The cost of the screening program per patient was £ 10, which is cheaper than all alternatives.
This cost is equivalent to £ 350 per patient with previously unrecognized disease and £ 1,000 per patient receiving laser treatment.
These costs are low compared with alternatives and could be further reduced by screening more patients per unit.
5 tables, 23 references.
Renal Care 92 TITLE: Cost Analysis of Kidney-Pancreas and Kidney-Islet Transplant.
Lenisa, L.; Castoldi, R.; Socci, C.; Motta, F.; Ferrari, G.; Pozza, G.; Di Carlo, V. Transplantation Proceedings.
27 (6): 3061-3064.
December 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To compare outcomes and costs for patients with diabetes undergoing kidneypancreas or kidney-islet cell transplantation.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Costs for kidney-pancreas and kidney-islet cell transplantation were nearly the same.
Pancreas grafts had better actuarial survival than islet cell grafts.
RECOMMENDATION: Improvements are needed in isolation and purification techniques for islet cell transplantation, which might lower costs for that approach.
ABSTRACT: The authors report the costs for 51 kidney-pancreas transplants and 21 kidneyislet cell transplants in patients with type 1 diabetes transplanted at an Italian hospital since 1989.
Among kidney-islet cell patients, 14 received islet cells after kidney transplantation and 7 received islet cells simultaneously with the kidney.
All 72 patients received the same immunosuppression and antimicrobial and vascular thrombosis prophylaxis.
Actuarial survival was calculated from life tables.
Expenditures were the actual costs incurred for hospitalization from pretransplant evaluation until discharge; kidney-islet cell costs were calculated based on using islets from two pancreases per kidney-islet cell transplant and assuming simultaneous transplantation of islet cells.
Actuarial survival at 48 months was 70 and 52 percent for pancreas and islet cell grafts, respectively.
Peri-operative mortality, morbidity, and incidence of surgical complications were 1.9 and 5 percent, 54 and 29 percent, and 43 and 4.8 percent for kidney-pancreas and kidney-islet cell, respectively.
Total transplantation costs were comparable ($46,085 for kidney-pancreas and $47,550 for kidney-islet cell).
Graft retrieval cost $1,400 for kidney-pancreas versus $2,260 for kidney-islet cell; islet cell isolation cost $15,500.
Costs for surgery, hospitalization, and immunosuppression were higher for kidneypancreas than for kidney-islet cell ($5,440 versus $2,580, $30,765 versus $20,790, and $5,640 versus $3,760, respectively).
Patients stayed in intensive care a mean of 7 days for kidneypancreas versus 3 days for kidney-islet cell transplantation and in the medical department a mean of 60 versus 50 days, respectively.
Hospitalization represented 67 percent of kidneypancreas and 44 percent of kidney-islet cell costs; islet cell isolation represented 32 percent of kidney-islet cell costs.
The mean length of hospital stay (the major cost for both groups) is likely to be lowered.
Improvements in islet cell isolation might decrease costs for kidney-islet cell transplantation.
2 figures, 2 tables, 6 references.
93 TITLE: The Cost of Immunosuppression and Coverage of Immunosuppressive Drugs for Kidney Transplant Recipients Under the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act.
In: Cost and Outcome Analysis of Kidney Transplantation: The Implications of Initial Immunosuppressive Protocol and Diabetes (Final Report: Volume I).
Evans, R.W.; Manninen, D.L.; Thompson, C. Battelle Human Affairs Research Centers, Seattle, Washington.
1989.
Chapter 13.
OBJECTIVE: To provide the Health Care Financing Administration with information it needs to quantify the economic consequences of the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: There are likely to be relatively few changes in transplant immunosuppression between 1988 and 1995 that will seriously affect the overall costs of organ transplantation.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988 will shield Medicare beneficiaries from excessive hospital, doctor, and outpatient prescription drug bills.
In this chapter, the authors project the number of kidney transplant recipients likely to be eligible for Medicare catastrophic coverage through 1995, estimate per-patient annual expenditures for immunosuppressive drugs during the year of transplant and subsequent years, and highlight future developments in the field of transplant immunosuppression.
In 1987, there were 39,585 living kidney transplant recipients; for 1995 the authors project totals ranging from 63,910 (base case) to 144,653.
The authors note that cyclosporine was approved by the Food and Drug Administration in 1983; for 1990 through 1995 they project that 95 percent of transplants (cadaver or living related donor) will use this drug as a primary immunosuppressive agent.
They present cost estimates associated with major immunosuppressive protocols in use in the United States; per the "high" estimate, total firstyear costs range from $947 for conventional immunosuppression without antithymocyte globulin to $12,819 for quadruple-drug cyclosporine therapy.
Subsequent-year annual costs range from $793 for conventional immunosuppression to $8,227 for triple-drug cyclosporine therapy (U.S. variation); this cost is $6,870 for quadruple-drug cyclosporine therapy.
Per the National Task Force on Organ Transplantation (1985), the cost-effectiveness of cyclosporine therapy is believed to exceed that of conventional therapy, but the Task Force assumed that patients on cyclosporine would be converted to conventional therapy within 1 year after transplant.
The authors state that triple-drug and quadruple-drug cyclosporine therapy appear to be equally cost effective.
56 tables, 5 figures.
94 TITLE: Cost-Effective Treatment for Diabetic End-Stage Renal Disease: Dialysis, Kidney, or Kidney-Pancreas Transplantation? Lenisa, L.; Castoldi, R.; Socci, C.; Motta, F.; Ferrari, G.; Spotti, D.; Caldara, R.; Secchi, A.; Pozza, G.; Di Carlo, V. Transplantation Proceedings.
27 (6): 3108-3113.
December 1995.
OBJECTIVE: To compare the survival, morbidity, and cost of hemodialysis, kidney transplantation, and kidney-pancreas transplantation in patients with end-stage renal disease associated with type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: In terms of survival rate and financial savings, kidney-pancreas transplantation is the most cost effective of the three treatments.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors report survival, morbidity, and cost data for 122 patients with type 1 diabetes treated at San Raffaele Hospital in Milan, Italy.
All patients had undergone hemodialysis (HD); in this study, 48 remained on HD, 23 underwent kidney transplantation (K), and 51 had a kidney-pancreas transplant (KP).
Survival rates were calculated by life-table methods from the beginning of HD for all patients and from the third month after transplantation for K and KP.
To correct for selection bias, survival curves were also calculated from the day of transplantation for the K and KP groups and from 25 months after initiation of HD for the HD group (25 months was the mean duration of dialysis at transplantation for the transplant groups).
Expenditures were the actual costs (undiscounted) incurred for hospitalization from pretransplant evaluation until discharge and for consumable materials, depreciation of machinery and buildings, and personnel costs.
Actuarial survival 96 months from initial HD for HD, K, and KP was 40 percent, 70 percent, and 87 percent, respectively (p 
In KP, there were five kidney transplant failures and one pancreas graft failure; in K, there was one graft failure.
Peri-operative mortality was 8.7 percent in K and 1.9 percent in KP.
The first year of HD cost $43,150 for 3 treatments per week, monthly assessment, and vascular access.
Transplantation costs were $30,090 for K and $46,085 for KP. Surgery, hospitalization, and rejection treatment costs were higher for KP than K. Estimated costs for each year after transplantation were $13,070 for K and $10,880 for KP, which were 32 percent and 27 percent of expected yearly HD costs, respectively.
4 figures, 3 tables, 15 references.
95 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness Modeling of Simultaneous Pancreas-Kidney Transplantation.
Holohan, T.V. International Journal of Technology Assessment in Health Care.
12(3): 416424.
Summer 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To compare simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation and kidney transplantation plus continued insulin therapy in patients with type 1 diabetes using a costeffectiveness model.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The model predicted that simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation would be less cost effective than a kidney transplant plus continued insulin therapy except for patients with complicated diabetes that was poorly responsive to exogenous insulin and whose costs of maintaining blood glucose control were high.
In that scenario, the two interventions were equal in cost-effectiveness.
RECOMMENDATION: These cost-effectiveness analyses should be reviewed periodically as data on pancreas survival after simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplant accumulate and as more comprehensive cost information becomes available.
ABSTRACT: In the authors' cost-effectiveness model, estimated costs for 100 hypothetical recipients of simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplants were compared with those for 100 hypothetical recipients of a kidney transplant only.
Cost estimates for transplant procedures and for maintaining blood glucose control in those without a normally functioning pancreas as well as estimates of the quality of life resulting from transplant were considered.
Costs were estimated for a 3-year posttransplant period; costs for kidney transplant alone included ongoing expenses of treating hyperglycemia or hypoglycemia.
The model assumed no renal graft loss in either group; pancreas graft survival rates were based on United Network for Organ Sharing data.
The costs of combined transplant included managing hyperglycemia or hypoglycemia in those patients whose pancreas grafts failed over time.
Payment data for the procedures were obtained from the Health Insurance Association of America, the Health Care Financing Administration, and a survey of transplant centers.
The cost per quality-adjusted life-year of the two procedures was equivalent only when the annual cost of blood glucose control was in the range of $28,000 to $40,000.
Simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplant was therefore likely to be equivalent in cost-effectiveness to kidney transplant plus continued insulin therapy only for those patients whose annual direct costs of blood glucose maintenance were high, in the range of $15,000 to more than $40,000 per year.
Average annual direct costs for treating diabetes and its complications have been estimated to be $6,280 by the American Diabetes Association.
1 figure, 4 tables, 65 references.
96 TITLE: Cost-Effectiveness of Screening and Early Treatment of Nephropathy in Patients with Insulin-Dependent Diabetes Mellitus.
Siegel, J.E.; Krolewski, A.S.; Warram, J.H.; Weinstein, M.C. Journal of the American Society of Nephrology.
3(Suppl 1): S111-S119.
October 1992.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the effect of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors (ACEIs) on survival and the cost of using these drugs at an early stage of nephropathy; to determine what kind of intervention program with ACEIs would be appropriate.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-effectiveness analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Early treatment of type 1 diabetes with ACEIs can be a very cost-effective use of health care resources.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: Researchers developed a model to simulate the progression of renal complications in newly diagnosed type 1 diabetes patients to determine the effectiveness of using ACEIs as a treatment modality.
Three alternative strategies (programs) were analyzed (versus standard antihypertensive treatment); patients were screened twice annually for renal complications in each.
Overt proteinuria, significant microalbuminuria, and microalbuminuria were treatment indicators for ACEIs in programs 1, 2, and 3, respectively.
The progression of nephropathy and medical care costs incurred with the new programs were compared with those for standard treatment.
Cost-effectiveness was considered the ratio of the net increase in health care costs (discounted by 5 percent per year) to the discounted net improvement in health outcome (life expectancy).
With standard treatment, a cohort of 15-year-old patients with type 1 diabetes had a median life expectancy of 44.9 years (undiscounted) and lifetime costs for treatment of $4,706 per person (discounted).
Program 1 was used as the baseline to calculate cost-effectiveness ratios because it had lower costs and it improved life expectancy more than standard treatment.
Program 1 lifetime costs were $4,643 per person (discounted) and additional life expectancy was 45.1 years (undiscounted), assuming a starting age of 15 years.
Values for program 2 were $5,542 and 45.3 years; program 3, $5,927 and 45.5 years.
Program 2 offers additional life savings at an additional cost; however, it is not a costeffective option; the substantial increase in screening and treatment costs from this program is not offset by a sufficient increase in life expectancy.
Program 3 had the highest initial costs but avoided twice as many cases of renal failure as program 1; it provided an additional 5 to 8 months of life expectancy (not discounted) and its incremental cost-effectiveness ratio was $7,900 to $16,500 per additional year of life saved.
Resources permitting, program 3 would be the preferred choice.
1 figure, 6 tables, 23 references.
97 TITLE: The Costs of Nephropathy in Type II Diabetes.
Borch-Johnsen, B. PharmacoEconomics.
8(Supplement 1):40-45.
1995.
OBJECTIVE: To discuss the problem of nephropathy in patients with diabetes, including the social cost of this disorder and the economics of prevention.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Screening, intervention, and treatment for nephropathy is cost effective in type 1 diabetes patients; more research on this issue is needed for type 2 diabetes.
RECOMMENDATION: Future controlled clinical trials on the benefits of screening for diabetic nephropathy should focus on type 2 diabetes patients.
ABSTRACT: The lifetime risk of diabetic nephropathy may be as low as 15 to 25 percent in type 1 diabetes patients.
Studies of the natural history of nephropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes are difficult to perform, but research in selected high-risk populations has found incidence patterns to be similar for types 1 and 2 diabetes.
Patients with diabetic nephropathy have an increased risk (versus other patients with diabetes) of developing other late diabetic complications (e.g., they have a relative risk of 5-10 for acute myocardial infarction and 2-4 for stroke).
Genetic susceptibility appears to be essential for developing nephropathy.
Important risk factors for nephropathy among type 2 diabetes patients include young age at diagnosis, familial predisposition, poor metabolic control, hypertension, retinopathy, and microalbuminuria.
The author discusses a model for estimating the actual costs of diabetic renal disease in a society; epidemiological data, results of controlled clinical trials, and reliable cost data are needed for the model.
Studies of type 1 diabetes patients show the costs of treating end-stage renal failure to be so high that, even for rather expensive screening, intervention, and treatment programs, the benefits exceed the costs; a separate analysis would be needed for type 2 diabetes patients.
In white populations in western Europe and North America, most type 2 diabetes patients will die from vascular disease.
In nonwhite populations, the incidence of type 2 diabetes in patients below age 50 is much higher than in whites, and these patients will live long enough to develop diabetic nephropathy.
Intervention trials targeted at preventing end-stage renal failure in type 2 diabetes patients are urgently needed; studies in Asia, the Pacific Islands, and Latin America (high-risk areas for early-onset type 2 diabetes) should be encouraged.
1 figure, 4 tables, 21 references.
98 TITLE: Economic Analysis of Captopril in the Treatment of Diabetic Nephropathy.
Rodby, R.A.; Firth, L.M.; Lewis, E.J.; the Collaborative Study Group.
Diabetes Care.
19(10): 10511061.
October 1996.
OBJECTIVE: To determine the long-term impact on health care costs of using captopril therapy in patients with diabetic nephropathy to delay the progression to end-stage renal disease (ESRD) or death.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: The analysis showed that captopril therapy in patients with type 1 or type 2 diabetes and overt nephropathy saves substantial direct costs and reduces health care expenditures for treatment of ESRD.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors assessed the long-term impact on health care costs of treating patients with diabetic nephropathy with captopril, an antihypertensive drug.
A medical treatment model was developed to compare the costs and benefits of captopril therapy in delaying the progression to ESRD or death.
The model was based on data derived from a prospective, double-blind, multicenter clinical trial of captopril in patients with type 1 diabetes and nephropathy.
In that model, captopril therapy reduced the risk of both progressive renal insufficiency and the combined endpoint of death, dialysis, and transplantation by about 50 percent.
Data for patients with type 2 diabetes were projected from the type 1 study.
The model assessed the economic impact of captopril therapy over the projected lifespans of patients in the study (31 years for patients with type 1 diabetes and 12 years for patients with type 2).
Projected costs for ESRD included direct costs associated with treatment (dialysis and transplantation), including transportation, and indirect costs related to disability and premature death.
Direct and indirect costs were stated in 1994 dollars; both costs and lifeyears saved were discounted at 5 percent.
Direct lifetime cost savings associated with captopril use were $32,550 per patient for those with type 1 diabetes and $9,900 per patient for those with type 2.
Indirect per-patient cost savings were $84,390 and $45,730 for those with type 1 and type 2 respectively.
These savings included future monies not spent on ESRD treatment because of death of some patients from other causes, such as cardiovascular disease.
According to the model, if captopril therapy were initiated in 1995 for patients with either type of diabetes and nephropathy, the aggregate health care costs savings would be $189 million a year for the year 1999 and $475 million a year in 2004; the present value of cumulative health care cost savings over 10 years would be $2.4 billion.
4 figures, 2 tables, 2 appendixes, 66 references.
99 TITLE: Economic Evaluation of the Contribution of Captopril in the Treatment of Diabetic Nephropathy: A Cost-Effectiveness Approach.
(Article in French with an English abstract.)
Le Pen, C.; Petitjean, P.; Lévy, P.; Hannedouche, T. Nephrologie.
17(6): 321-326.
1996.
OBJECTIVE: To evaluate the cost-benefit ratio of the use of captopril to treat nephropathy in patients with type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Randomized clinical trial.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: The use of captopril to treat nephropathy in patients with type 1 diabetes is therapeutically and economically efficacious, especially for patients who require antihypertensive therapy as well.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The authors analyzed the cost benefit of captopril treatment of nephropathy in patients with type 1 diabetes, using previously published data from a randomized, doubleblind, clinical trial (Lewis.
New England Journal of Medicine 329: 1456-1462.
1993).
Patients had been diagnosed at least 7 years previously and had proteinuria greater than 500 mg/24 hours and blood creatinine less than 221 Fmol/L at entry.
Serum creatinine doubled in 25 of the captopril group (n = 207, 25 mg, 3 times per day for an average of 883 days) and in 43 of the placebo group (n = 202, average of 824 days; p 
The combined death, dialysis, or transplantation events numbered 23 (8 deaths) in the treatment group and 42 (14 deaths) in the placebo group (p 
Costs were calculated based on 1993 French health care costs and on the Lewis data from which the effects of other antihypertensive treatment could not be separated nor costs of screening for admission to the study or follow-up determined.
Captopril treatment cost 1,263,017 French francs (FFr) for the cohort (FFr 6,101.53 per patient); other antihypertensives cost (in FFr) 543,271 in the captopril group and 649,832 in the placebo group.
In the captopril and placebo groups, hospitalizations cost (in FFr) 630,312.98 and 712,752.14, respectively, and dialysis/transplantation cost (in FFr) 13,842,500 and 20,912,500, respectively.
Overall, the cost savings in the captopril group was FFr 5,995,983; a savings of 131 life-years was also realized in the captopril group.
If all patients were treated with captopril for nephropathy, the net cost-benefit would be FFr 475 per patient.
These savings actually underestimate cost-benefit since they do not include, for instance, the hospitalization costs for vascular access and initiation of dialysis or pretransplant examinations.
Further economic benefits from captopril would be expected from a study of longer duration.
5 tables, 10 references.
100 TITLE: Employment, Work Disability, and Income Support Program Participation.
In: A Cost and Outcome Analysis of Kidney Transplantation: The Implications of Initial Immunosuppressive Protocol and Diabetes (Final Report: Volume I).
Evans, R.W.; Manninen, D.L.; Thompson, C. Battelle Human Affairs Research Centers, Seattle, Washington.
1989.
Chapter 8.
OBJECTIVE: To examine the employment and work disability experience of renal transplant patients after their transplant surgery.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Survey.
Perspective: Societal.
CONCLUSION: Kidney transplantation is not very effective in allowing previously disabled dialysis patients to return to the labor force.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: In this multicenter observational study (sponsored by the Health Care Financing Administration) of patients who underwent kidney transplantation, questionnaires were used to find out about employment status in the year prior to transplant and at 3, 6, 9, 12, and 15 months after the procedure.
Sample sizes frequently differed by analysis.
Just over half (50.7 percent) of patients reported they were employed either full time or part time in the year prior to surgery; 3 months after surgery, only 28.7 percent said they were employed.
In an analysis by primary renal diagnosis, less than half (43.3 percent) of those whose diagnosis was not diabetes and 33.3 percent of those with a diabetes diagnosis were employed full time before transplant; 23.8 and 20.0 percent, respectively, were employed full time 3 months later.
On the issue of ability to work (not employment status), rates for the diabetes and nondiabetes groups were as follows: not able to work for pay, 63.1 percent and 39.1 percent; limited in kind of work, 83.1 percent and 58.6 percent.
Three months posttransplant, 43.5 percent of transplant patients were receiving Social Security retirement or disability benefits and 17.8 percent were receiving Supplemental Security Income.
More than half (53.8 percent) of patients with a primary renal diagnosis of diabetes were receiving Social Security retirement or disability benefits at that time.
Although 97.2 percent of transplant patients said they received assistance (Medicare, State Kidney Program, Medicaid, etc.) in paying for immunosuppressive drugs, 22.8 percent said they had difficulty paying for the drugs.
Fifteen months following transplantation, 43.1 percent of patients reported being employed either full or part time, but the number of patients for whom employment status was known was very small (n = 51).
27 tables.
101 TITLE: Hospital Charges.
In: Cost and Outcome Analysis of Kidney Transplantation: The Implications of Initial Immunosuppressive Protocol and Diabetes (Final Report: Volume I).
Evans, R.W.; Manninen, D.L.; Thompson, C. Battelle Human Affairs Research Centers, Seattle, Washington.
1989.
Chapter 12.
OBJECTIVE: To analyze costs of the initial hospital stay and follow-up periods for patients undergoing kidney transplantation.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Cost analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Kidney transplantation is an expensive procedure.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: In this multicenter observational study of kidney transplantation, which was sponsored by the Health Care Financing Administration, the authors analyzed hospital charges rather than costs.
The mean charge for the transplant procedure (the initial hospital stay), including professional fees, was $41,046 (range: $18,484 to $727,392); length of stay ranged from 6 to 252 days (n = 396).
Patients were compared by whether their primary renal diagnosis was diabetes: Average transplant charges for the nondiabetes group were $41,587; for the diabetes group, they were $39,718.
Estimated follow-up hospital charges (not including professional fees) in the first year after transplant were $22,098 for the diabetes group and $12,533 for those without the diabetes diagnosis.
Patients with a diabetes diagnosis averaged more follow-up hospital days than other patients in the first four posttransplant periods (each 3 months), with the most pronounced difference in the 6-9-month period (5.8 days versus 1.5 days).
For the 24 patients who experienced a graft failure or died between initial hospital discharge and the 3-month checkpoint, hospital charges for this period (excluding professional fees) averaged $31,049.
In contrast, for the 346 patients with functioning grafts at 3 months, average charges were $3,835.
13 tables.
102 (Cross-Reference 161) TITLE: Is Screening and Intervention for Microalbuminuria Worthwhile in Patients with Insulin Dependent Diabetes? Borch-Johnsen, K.; Wenzel, H.; Viberti, G.C.; Mogensen, C.E. British Medical Journal.
306(6894): 1722-1725.
June 1993.
Correction: 307(6903): 543.
August 1993.
OBJECTIVE: To analyze the cost benefit of screening for microalbuminuria and providing antihypertensive treatment for early renal disease indicated by microalbuminuria in patients with type 1 diabetes.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Epidemiological cohort model.
Methodology: Cost-benefit analysis.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: Assuming drug treatment effects (delay in normal progression of microalbuminuria) of 33 percent or 67 percent, median life expectancy increased by 4 or 14 years, respectively, and the need for dialysis or transplantation decreased by 21 percent or 63 percent.
Establishing a screening program for microalbuminuria for patients with type 1 diabetes would be economically neutral at a treatment effect of 11 percent and a discount rate of 6 percent.
RECOMMENDATION: A screening program including annual measurement of urinary albumin excretion rate should be implemented to help increase life expectancy and reduce endstage renal failure, and an intervention program of antihypertensive treatment should also be considered (it is known to be effective in patients with nephropathy, and its effectiveness for microalbuminuria has been suggested by clinical studies).
ABSTRACT: This cost-benefit analysis of the effects of a screening and antihypertensive intervention program for microalbuminuria used a computer simulation of a 30-year program involving an imaginary cohort of 8,000 patients with type 1 diabetes, whose urine was screened annually beginning 5 years after onset of the disease.
Objectives were to estimate mortality, incidence of nephropathy, and need for kidney transplantation or dialysis as well as the direct costs and savings associated with preventing or postponing the development of nephropathy.
One scenario described the natural progression of the cohort and another the progression of the same cohort with screening and treatment.
The economic evaluation was based on direct costs (screening, antihypertensive treatment in patients with microalbuminuria and nephropathy, dialysis, kidney transplantation, and immunosuppressive agents in patients needing transplants).
Costs (and savings) were based on 1991 German sickness fund prices and were given in Deutschmarks (DM).
A progression rate of 20 percent was assumed for untreated microalbuminuria.
Assuming treatment effects (decrease in progression rate) of 33 percent or 67 percent, median life expectancy would increase by 4 or 14 years, respectively; onset of nephropathy, by 6 or 24 years; and the need for kidney transplantation or dialysis by 21 percent or 63 percent, respectively.
Costs and savings would balance with a real discount rate of 6 percent a year and an antihypertensive treatment effect of 11 percent or with a real discount rate of 2.5 percent and an 8 percent treatment effect.
Savings per patient would range from DM 1,500 (U.S. $800) with a discount rate of 6 percent and a treatment effect of 33 percent to DM 11,000 for a discount rate of 2.5 percent and a 67 percent treatment effect.
4 figures, 3 tables, 35 references.
103 TITLE: Pancreas Transplantation as a Treatment for Diabetes: Indications and Outcome.
Sutherland, D.E. Current Therapy in Endocrinology and Metabolism.
5: 457-460.
1994.
OBJECTIVE: To review the indications for various pancreas transplantation options and their outcomes and costs.
CATEGORY: Tertiary intervention.
Type of Study: Patient management.
Methodology: Review of studies.
Perspective: Health care system.
CONCLUSION: It is more expensive to treat diabetes with a pancreas transplant than with insulin injections, but if secondary complications are ameliorated, health care costs over a lifetime may be less than if the recipient remained diabetic.
Improved quality of life in patients who have received a pancreas transplant also justifies the cost of the procedure.
RECOMMENDATION: None.
ABSTRACT: The author examines pancreas transplantation in terms of medical and quality of life outcomes as well as costs.
Worldwide, more than 4,000 pancreas transplants had been reported by 1992, including 2,600 in the United States.
Successful pancreas transplantation may stabilize retinopathy over the long term and significantly improve survival pro
